Arkansas, session 2025, HB1011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TITLE.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Restore Roe Act".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to protect a woman’s right to
obtain abortion services up to the point of fetal viability, as provided for
in the United States Constitution, according to the United States Supreme
Court in the 1973 decision Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113, 162 (1973), with
limited exceptions following fetal viability for the health or life of the
mother or in case of rape or incest perpetrated on a minor.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 61, Subchapter 3, is
repealed.
Subchapter 3 — Arkansas Human Life Protection Act
*JMB006*
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011

5-61-301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Human
Life Protection Act”.

5-61-302. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) It is time for the United States Supreme Court to redress
and correct the grave injustice and the crime against humanity which is being
perpetuated by its decisions in Roe v. Wade, Doe v. Bolton, and Planned
Parenthood v. Casey;
(2) The United States Supreme Court committed a grave injustice
and a crime against humanity in the Dred Scott decision by denying personhood
to a class of human beings, African-Americans;
(3) The United States Supreme Court also committed a grave
injustice and a crime against humanity by upholding the “separate but equal”
doctrine in Plessy v. Ferguson which withdrew legal protection from a class
of human beings who were persons under the United States Constitution,
African-Americans;
(4) A crime against humanity occurs when a government withdraws
legal protection from a class of human beings resulting in severe deprivation
of their rights, up to and including death;
(5) In Brown v. Board of Education, the United States Supreme
Court corrected its own grave injustice and crime against humanity created in
Plessy v. Ferguson by overruling and abolishing the fifty-eight-year-old
“separate but equal” doctrine, thus giving equal legal rights to African-
Americans;
(6) Under the doctrine of stare decisis, the three (3) abortion
cases mentioned in subdivision (a)(1) of this section meet the test for when
a case should be overturned by the United States Supreme Court because of
significant changes in facts or laws, including without limitation the
following:
(A) The cases have not been accepted by scholars, judges,
and the American people, as witnessed to by the fact that these cases are
still the most intensely controversial cases in American history and at the
present time;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(B) New scientific advances have demonstrated since 1973
that life begins at the moment of conception and the child in a woman's womb
is a human being;
(C) Scientific evidence and personal testimonies document
the massive harm that abortion causes to women;
(D) The laws in all fifty (50) states have now changed
through “Safe Haven” laws to eliminate all burden of child care from women
who do not want to care for a child; and
(E) Public attitudes favoring adoption have created a
culture of adoption in the United States with many families waiting long
periods of time to adopt newborn infants;
(7) Before the United States Supreme Court decision of Roe v.
Wade, Arkansas had already enacted prohibitions on abortions under § 5-61-101
et seq., and authorized the refusal to perform, participate, consent, or
submit to an abortion under § 20-16-601;
(8) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 68, states that the policy
of Arkansas is to protect the life of every unborn child from conception
until birth and that public funds shall not be used to pay for any abortion
except to save the life of the mother;
(9) Arkansas passed the Arkansas Human Heartbeat Protection Act,
§ 20-16-1301 et seq., in 2013 which shows the will of the Arkansas people to
save the lives of unborn children;
(10) Arkansas has continued to pass additional legislation in
2015 and 2017 that further shows the will of the Arkansas people to save the
lives of unborn children;
(11)(A) Since the decision of Roe v. Wade, approximately
sixty million sixty-nine thousand nine hundred seventy-one (60,069,971)
abortions have ended the lives of unborn children.
(B) In 2015, six hundred thirty-eight thousand one hundred
sixty-nine (638,169) legal induced abortions were reported to the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention from forty-nine (49) reporting areas in the
United States.
(C) The Department of Health reports that three thousand
two hundred forty-nine (3,249) abortions took place in Arkansas during 2017,
including abortions performed on out-of-state residents; and
(12) The State of Arkansas urgently pleads with the United States
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
Supreme Court to do the right thing, as it did in one of its greatest cases,
Brown v. Board of Education, which overturned a fifty-eight-year-old
precedent of the United States, and reverse, cancel, overturn, and annul Roe
v. Wade, Doe v. Bolton, and Planned Parenthood v. Casey.
(b) It is the intent of this subchapter to ensure that abortion in
Arkansas is abolished and protect the lives of unborn children.

5-61-303. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using, prescribing,
administering, procuring, or selling of any instrument, medicine, drug, or
any other substance, device, or means with the purpose to terminate the
pregnancy of a woman, with knowledge that the termination by any of those
means will with reasonable likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the purpose to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Fertilization” means the fusion of a human spermatozoon
with a human ovum;
(3) “Medical emergency” means a condition in which an abortion
is necessary to preserve the life of a pregnant woman whose life is
endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury,
including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the
pregnancy itself; and
(4) “Unborn child” means an individual organism of the species
Homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth.

5-61-304. Prohibition.
(a) A person shall not purposely perform or attempt to perform an
abortion except to save the life of a pregnant woman in a medical emergency.
(b) Performing or attempting to perform an abortion is an unclassified
felony with a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
imprisonment not to exceed ten (10) years, or both.
(c) This section does not:
(1) Authorize the charging or conviction of a woman with any
criminal offense in the death of her own unborn child; or
(2) Prohibit the sale, use, prescription, or administration of a
contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical if the contraceptive measure, drug,
or chemical is administered before the time when a pregnancy could be
determined through conventional medical testing and if the contraceptive
measure, drug, or chemical is sold, used, prescribed, or administered in
accordance with manufacturer instructions.
(d) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section if
a licensed physician provides medical treatment to a pregnant woman which
results in the accidental or unintentional injury or death to the unborn
child.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 61, Subchapter 4, is
repealed.
Subchapter 4 — Arkansas Unborn Child Protection Act

5-61-401. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Unborn
Child Protection Act”.

5-61-402. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) It is time for the United States Supreme Court to redress
and correct the grave injustice and the crime against humanity which is being
perpetuated by its decisions in Roe v. Wade, Doe v. Bolton, and Planned
Parenthood v. Casey;
(2) The United States Supreme Court committed a grave injustice
and a crime against humanity in the Dred Scott decision by denying personhood
to a class of human beings, African-Americans;
(3) The United States Supreme Court also committed a grave
injustice and a crime against humanity by upholding the “separate but equal”
doctrine in Plessy v. Ferguson, which withdrew legal protection from a class
of human beings who were persons under the United States Constitution,
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
African-Americans;
(4) A crime against humanity occurs when a government withdraws
legal protection from a class of human beings, resulting in severe
deprivation of their rights, up to and including death;
(5) In Brown v. Board of Education, the United States Supreme
Court corrected its own grave injustice and crime against humanity created in
Plessy v. Ferguson by overruling and abolishing the fifty-eight-year-old
“separate but equal” doctrine, thus giving equal legal rights to African-
Americans;
(6) Under the doctrine of stare decisis, the three (3) abortion
cases mentioned in subdivision (a)(1) of this section meet the test for when
a case should be overturned by the United States Supreme Court because of
significant changes in facts or laws, including without limitation the
following:
(A) The cases have not been accepted by scholars, judges,
and the American people, as witnessed to by the fact that these cases are
still the most intensely controversial cases in American history and at the
present time;
(B) New scientific advances have demonstrated since 1973
that life begins at the moment of conception and that the child in a woman's
womb is a human being;
(C) Scientific evidence and personal testimonies document
the massive harm that abortion causes to women;
(D) The laws in all fifty (50) states have now changed
through “Safe Haven” laws to eliminate all burden of child care from women
who do not want to care for a child; and
(E) Public attitudes favoring adoption have created a
culture of adoption in the United States, with many families waiting long
periods of time to adopt newborn infants;
(7) Before the United States Supreme Court decision of Roe v.
Wade, Arkansas had already enacted prohibitions on abortions under § 5-61-101
et seq., and authorized the refusal to perform, participate, consent, or
submit to an abortion under § 20-16-601;
(8) Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 68, states that the policy
of Arkansas is to protect the life of every unborn child from conception
until birth and that public funds shall not be used to pay for any abortion,
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
except to save the life of the mother;
(9) Arkansas passed the Arkansas Human Heartbeat Protection Act,
§ 20-16-1301 et seq., in 2013, which shows the will of the Arkansas people to
save the lives of unborn children;
(10) Arkansas has continued to pass additional legislation in
2015, 2017, and 2019 that further shows the will of the Arkansas people to
save the lives of unborn children;
(11)(A) Since the decision of Roe v. Wade, approximately
sixty million sixty-nine thousand nine hundred seventy-one (60,069,971)
abortions have ended the lives of unborn children.
(B) In 2015, six hundred thirty-eight thousand one hundred
sixty-nine (638,169) legal induced abortions were reported to the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention from forty-nine (49) reporting areas in the
United States.
(C) The Department of Health reports that two thousand
nine hundred sixty-three (2,963) abortions took place in Arkansas during
2019, including abortions performed on out-of-state residents; and
(12) The State of Arkansas urgently pleads with the United States
Supreme Court to do the right thing, as they did in one of their greatest
cases, Brown v. Board of Education, which overturned a fifty-eight-year-old
precedent of the United States, and reverse, cancel, overturn, and annul Roe
v. Wade, Doe v. Bolton, and Planned Parenthood v. Casey.
(b) It is the intent of this subchapter to ensure that abortion in
Arkansas is abolished and to protect the lives of unborn children.

5-61-403. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using, prescribing,
administering, procuring, or selling of any instrument, medicine, drug, or
any other substance, device, or means with the purpose to terminate the
pregnancy of a woman, with knowledge that the termination by any of those
means will with reasonable likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the purpose to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Fertilization” means the fusion of a human spermatozoon
with a human ovum;
(3) “Medical emergency” means a condition in which an abortion
is necessary to preserve the life of a pregnant woman whose life is
endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury,
including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the
pregnancy itself; and
(4) “Unborn child” means an individual organism of the species
Homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth.

5-61-404. Prohibition.
(a) A person shall not purposely perform or attempt to perform an
abortion except to save the life of a pregnant woman in a medical emergency.
(b) Performing or attempting to perform an abortion is an unclassified
felony with a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or
imprisonment not to exceed ten (10) years, or both.
(c) This section does not:
(1) Authorize the charging or conviction of a woman with any
criminal offense in the death of her own unborn child; or
(2) Prohibit the sale, use, prescription, or administration of a
contraceptive measure, drug, or chemical if the contraceptive measure, drug,
or chemical is administered before the time when a pregnancy could be
determined through conventional medical testing and if the contraceptive
measure, drug, or chemical is sold, used, prescribed, or administered in
accordance with manufacturer instructions.
(d) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section if
a licensed physician provides medical treatment to a pregnant woman which
results in the accidental or unintentional physical injury or death to the
unborn child.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 12-12-315(a)(1)(O), concerning notification
of certain types of deaths, is amended to read as follows:
(O) The death is due to a criminal an illegal abortion;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 12-18-210 is repealed.
12-18-210. Prohibition on intentionally causing, aiding, abetting, or
assisting a child to obtain an abortion without parental consent.
(a)(1) A person shall not intentionally cause, aid, or assist a child
to obtain an abortion without the consent or notification regarding judicial
bypass of the requirement for consent under §§ 20-16-801, 20-16-804, and 20-
16-805.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not affect § 20-16-
808.
(b)(1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be
civilly liable to the child and to the person or persons required to give the
consent under § 20-16-801.
(2) A court may award:
(A) Damages to the person or persons adversely affected by
a violation of subsection (a) of this section, including compensation for
emotional injury without the need for personal presence at the act or event;
and
(B) Attorney's fees, litigation costs, and punitive
damages.
(3) An adult who engages in or consents to another person's
engaging in a sexual act with a child in violation of the Arkansas Criminal
Code, § 5-1-101 et seq., that results in the child's pregnancy shall not be
awarded damages under this section.
(c) An unemancipated child does not have capacity to consent to any
action in violation of this section.
(d) Upon a petition by any person adversely affected or who reasonably
may be adversely affected by the conduct, a court of competent jurisdiction
may enjoin conduct that would violate this section upon a showing that the
conduct:
(1) Is reasonably anticipated to occur in the future; or
(2) Has occurred in the past, whether with the same child or
others, and that it is not unreasonable to expect that the conduct will be
repeated.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1802(2)(B)(lv) is repealed.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(lv) Performing an abortion in violation of the
Arkansas Unborn Child Protection from Dismemberment Abortion Act, § 20-16-
1801 et seq.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-95-409(a)(2)(D), concerning the grounds
for denial, suspension, or revocation of a physician's license, is amended to
read as follows:
(D) Procuring or aiding or abetting in procuring a
wrongful and criminal illegal abortion;

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301, concerning the enumeration of
special revenues, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(276) Abortion clinic license fees, § 20-9-302;

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 20-9-302 is amended to read as follows:
20-9-302. Abortion clinics, health centers, etc. — Definitions.
(a)(1)(A)(i) A hospital shall not perform an abortion unless the
abortion is to save the life of the pregnant woman in a medical emergency
under § 5-61-304 or § 5-61-404.
(ii) An abortion permitted under § 5-61-304 or § 5-
61-404 shall not be performed or attempted unless the abortion takes place in
a hospital or an emergency room.
(B) As used in subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section:
(i)(a) “Abortion” means the act of using,
prescribing, administering, procuring, or selling of any instrument,
medicine, drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the purpose to
terminate the pregnancy of a woman, with knowledge that the termination by
any of those means will with reasonable likelihood cause the death of the
unborn child.
(b) An act under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)(a)
of this section is not an abortion if the act is performed with the purpose
to:
(1) Save the life or preserve the health
of the unborn child;
(2) Remove a dead unborn child caused by
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
spontaneous abortion; or
(3) Remove an ectopic pregnancy; and
(ii) “Medical emergency” means a condition in which
an abortion is necessary to preserve the life of a pregnant woman whose life
is endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury,
including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the
pregnancy.
(2)(A) The Department of Health shall inspect a clinic, health
center, or other facility at least annually, and inspections shall include
without limitation:
(i) The facilities, equipment, and conditions of a
clinic, health center, or other facility; and
(ii) A representative sample of procedures,
techniques, medical records, informed consent signatures, and parental
consent signatures.
(B) An inspector shall arrive at the clinic, health
center, or other facility unannounced and without prior notice.
(b) The department shall:
(1) Adopt appropriate rules, regarding without limitation the
facilities, equipment, procedures, techniques, medical records, informed
consent signatures, parental consent signatures, and conditions of a clinic,
health center, or other facility subject to the provisions of this section to
assure at a minimum that:
(A) The facilities, equipment, procedures, techniques, and
conditions of the clinic, health center, or other facility are aseptic and do
not constitute a health hazard;
(B) The medical records, informed consent signatures, and
parental consent signatures meet statutory requirements;
(C) The clinic, health center, or other facility provides
to the patient on a twenty-four-hour basis telephone consultation with a
registered nurse or physician associated with the clinic, health center, or
other facility;
(D) The clinic, health center, or other facility has a
written procedure for emergency transfer of a patient to an acute care
facility, including a medical record form that contains information required
for an emergency transfer to an acute care facility;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(E) The clinic, health center, or other facility is within
thirty (30) miles of a hospital that provides gynecological or surgical
services;
(F) The clinic, health center, or other facility has
drugs, oxygen, intravenous fluids, and other emergency equipment on-site and
readily available to stabilize a patient if necessary; and
(G) All staff at the clinic, health center, or other
facility have documented current competency in cardiopulmonary resuscitation;
(2) Levy and collect an annual fee of five hundred dollars
($500) per facility for issuance of a permanent license to an abortion
facility; and
(3)(A) Deny, suspend, or revoke licenses on any of the following
grounds:
(i) The violation of any provision of law or rule;
or
(ii) The permitting, aiding, or abetting of the
commission of any unlawful act in connection with the operation of the
institutions.
(B)(i) If the department determines to deny, suspend, or
revoke a license, the department shall send to the applicant or licensee, by
certified mail, a notice setting forth the particular reasons for the
determination.
(ii) The denial, suspension, or revocation shall
become final thirty (30) days after the mailing of the notice unless the
applicant or licensee gives written notice within the thirty-day period of a
desire for hearing.
(iii)(a) The department shall issue an
immediate suspension of a license if an investigation or survey determines
that:
(1) The applicant or licensee is in
violation of any state law or rule; and
(2) The violation or violations pose an
imminent threat to the health, welfare, or safety of a patient.
(b)(1) The department shall give the applicant
or licensee written notice of the immediate suspension.
(2) The suspension of the license is
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
effective upon the receipt of the written notice.
(iv) The denial, suspension, or revocation order
shall remain in effect until all violations have been corrected.
(C) The applicant or licensee shall:
(i) Be given a fair hearing; and
(ii) Have the right to present evidence as may be
proper.
(D)(i) On the basis of the evidence at the hearing, the
determination involved shall be affirmed or set aside.
(ii) A copy of the decision, setting forth the
finding of facts and the particular grounds upon which it is based, shall be
sent by certified mail to the applicant or licensee.
(iii) The decision shall become final fifteen (15)
days after it is mailed unless the applicant or licensee, within the fifteen-
day period, appeals the decision to the court.
(E) A full and complete record of all proceedings shall be
kept and all testimony shall be reported, but it need not be transcribed
unless the decision is appealed or a transcript is requested by an interested
party who shall pay the cost of preparing the transcript.
(F) Witnesses may be subpoenaed by either party and shall
be allowed fees at a rate prescribed by rule.
(G) The procedure governing hearings authorized by this
section shall be in accordance with rules promulgated by the department.
(a)(1) A clinic, health center, or other facility in which the
pregnancies of ten (10) or more women known to be pregnant are willfully
terminated or aborted each month, including nonsurgical abortions, shall be
licensed by the Department of Health.
(2) The facilities, equipment, procedures, techniques, and
conditions of the clinic, health center, or other facility are subject to
periodic inspection by the department.
(b) The department may adopt appropriate rules, regarding the
facilities, equipment, procedures, techniques, and conditions of a clinic,
health center, or other facility licensed under this section to ensure that
the facilities, equipment, procedures, techniques, and conditions of the
clinic, health center, or other facility are aseptic and do not constitute a
health hazard.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(c) The department may levy and collect an annual fee of five hundred
dollars ($500) per facility for issuance of a permanent license to an
abortion facility.
(c)(1)(d)(1) Applicants for a license shall file applications upon
such forms as are prescribed by the department.
(2) A license shall be issued only for the premises and persons
in the application and shall not be transferable.
(d)(1)(e)(1) A license shall be effective on a calendar-year basis and
shall expire on December 31 of each calendar year.
(2) Applications for annual license renewal shall be postmarked
no later than January 2 of the succeeding calendar year.
(3) License applications for existing institutions received
after that date shall be subject to a penalty of two dollars ($2.00) per day
for each day after January 2.
(e)(f) Subject to such rules as may be implemented by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, the disbursing officer for the department may transfer
all unexpended funds relative to the abortion clinics that pertain to fees
collected, as certified by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, to be
carried forward and made available for expenditures for the same purpose for
any following fiscal year.
(f)(g) All fees levied and collected under this section are special
revenues and shall be deposited into the State Treasury to be credited to the
Public Health Fund.
(g) The department shall:
(1) Send all abortion data collected under state law to the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;
(2) Record and report to the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention all instances of a suspension of a physician's license related to
abortions or abortion facilities; and
(3) Make available to the public via the Division of Vital
Records the following information:
(A) All abortion data collected under state law; and
(B) All instances of a suspension of a physician's license
related to abortions or abortion facilities.
(h)(1) A person who notifies an abortion facility that the department
may or will conduct its inspection on a specific date or time shall be guilty
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
upon conviction of a Class A misdemeanor.
(2) A person who knowingly conceals or removes information that
is relevant to an inspection of an abortion facility shall be guilty upon
conviction of a Class A misdemeanor.
(i) All inspections of abortion facilities shall be conducted by at
least two (2) persons at the same time.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 20-9-312 is repealed.
20-9-312. Written agreements of abortion facility.
(a)(1) An abortion facility shall enter into a written agreement with
a licensed acute care hospital that is capable of treating patients with
unforeseen complications related to procedures performed at an abortion
facility.
(2) Under the written agreement described in subdivision (a)(1)
of this section, the licensed acute care hospital shall agree to accept and
treat patients with unforeseen complications related to procedures performed
at an abortion facility.
(3) The written agreement described in subdivision (a)(1) of
this section shall:
(A) Be with a licensed acute care hospital located:
(i) In the same county as the abortion facility; or
(ii) No further than thirty (30) miles from the
abortion facility;
(B) Be a legally binding contractual document;
(C) Be signed by the individuals who:
(i) Are authorized to execute the written agreement
on behalf of the abortion facility and the licensed acute care hospital; and
(ii) Certify that they have the authority described
in subdivision (a)(3)(C)(i) of this section;
(D) Require transfer of a patient if deemed medically
necessary by the attending physician;
(E) Identify responsibilities of the abortion facility in
which the abortion facility shall at a minimum:
(i) At the time of transfer, provide the licensed
acute care hospital with complete and accurate information regarding the
patient being transferred to the licensed acute care hospital;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(ii) Notify the licensed acute care hospital of the
impending transfer of a patient and receive confirmation of the availability
of appropriate facilities, services, and staff necessary for the care of the
patient;
(iii) At the time of the transfer, provide the
licensed acute care hospital with copies of relevant portions of the
patient's clinical record;
(iv) Transfer the patient, the patient's medical
records, demographic information, insurance information, and other
information deemed necessary or otherwise required by law to facilitate the
provision of medical care when the patient arrives at the licensed acute care
hospital; and
(v) Arrange for the immediate transfer of the
patient's personal effects, including a document listing the effects; and
(F) Identify responsibilities of the licensed acute care
hospital in which the licensed acute care hospital shall at a minimum:
(i) Provide prompt and appropriate evaluation and
treatment of a patient transferred to the licensed acute care hospital under
the written agreement;
(ii) Accept responsibility for the patient's care
when the patient is received by the licensed acute care hospital;
(iii) Direct charges performed by the licensed acute
care hospital to the patient or the patient's third-party payer; and
(iv) Acknowledge receipt of the patient's personal
effects in writing signed by an authorized representative of the licensed
acute care hospital and deliver the receipt to the abortion facility.
(b) If an unforeseen complication arises before or during a procedure
performed at an abortion facility, the patient shall be transferred to:
(1) The licensed acute care hospital with which the abortion
facility has a written agreement as described in subsection (a) of this
section; or
(2) A hospital selected by the patient.
(c)(1) An abortion facility shall enter into a written agreement with
a licensed local ambulance service for the transport of any emergency patient
within the scope of subsection (a) of this section to the licensed acute care
hospital.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(2) The written agreement described in subdivision (c)(1) of
this section shall:
(A) Be with a licensed local ambulance service located:
(i) In the same county as the abortion facility; or
(ii) No further than five (5) miles or ten (10)
minutes' normal driving time from the abortion facility;
(B) Be signed by the individuals who:
(i) Are authorized to execute the written agreement
on behalf of the abortion facility and the licensed local ambulance service;
and
(ii) Certify that they have the authority described
in subdivision (c)(2)(B)(i) of this section; and
(C) Identify responsibilities of the licensed local
ambulance service in which the licensed local ambulance service shall at a
minimum:
(i) Provide services in accordance with all federal
and state laws, federal regulations, and state rules applicable to emergency
service entities;
(ii) Employ sufficient staff, including paramedics
and emergency medical technicians, to provide patient care and operate
vehicles and equipment in accordance with industry standards and applicable
federal and state laws, federal regulations, and state rules;
(iii) Require all responding medical personnel to
familiarize themselves with the floor plan of the abortion facility to
minimize the time required to locate the patient in the facility and exit the
facility with the patient as expeditiously as possible;
(iv) Acknowledge the existence of and the licensed
local ambulance service's familiarity with the terms of the written agreement
between the abortion facility and the licensed acute care hospital; and
(v) Transport the patient to the licensed acute care
hospital that is party to the written agreement unless otherwise directed by
the patient.
(d) Within ten (10) days of finalization of the written agreements
described in subsections (a) and (c) of this section, the abortion facility
shall file the written agreements described in subsections (a) and (c) of
this section with the Department of Health.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(e) An abortion facility shall have ninety (90) days after July 28,
2021, to come into compliance with this section.
(f)(1) An abortion facility applying for a renewal license or an
applicant for a provisional license may submit a request in writing for
extensions of time to comply with the written agreement requirements
described in subsections (a) and (c) of this section to the Secretary of the
Department of Health in accordance with the provisions of this subsection.
(2) Any request shall:
(A) Be in writing;
(B) Contain a certification under oath that the abortion
facility seeking the extension of time has exhausted all reasonable efforts
to obtain a written agreement described in subsections (a) and (c) of this
section for a continuous ninety-calendar-day period before the request; and
(C) Contain a detailed description of the efforts taken to
secure the written agreements described in subsections (a) and (c) of this
section.
(3) In deciding to grant or deny the request for an extension of
time, the secretary shall consider all factors the secretary deems relevant
under the circumstances, but at least the following factors:
(A) Whether the abortion facility or applicant made, and
continues to make, a good faith effort to obtain a written agreement
described in subsections (a) and (c) of this section;
(B) Whether the abortion facility or applicant can provide
the same level of patient care and safety via alternative health services
during any extension period; and
(C) Regulatory compliance history at the abortion facility
and at any other healthcare facility owned, in whole or in part, by the
applicant or any other individual or entity having an ownership interest with
the abortion facility.
(4) If the request is granted, the extension of time shall be
effective for a time period of ninety (90) calendar days from the date of
issuance.
(5) The secretary may rescind a previously granted extension of
time at any time upon determining that the abortion facility or applicant has
not met, or is not meeting, the conditions of subdivision (f)(3) of this
section.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(6) If the request is for a written agreement described in
subsection (a) of this section, the written agreement described in subsection
(c) of this section does not have to comply with subdivisions (c)(2)(C)(iv)
and (v) of this section for the duration of the extension of time.
(7)(A) If a request for an extension is denied, an abortion
facility or applicant shall have ten (10) calendar days to submit a written
request for reconsideration to the secretary, whose decision shall be final.
(B) The abortion facility or applicant for provisional
license may appeal a denial in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative
Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(g)(1) This section does not create or recognize a right to abortion.
(2) This section is not intended to make lawful an abortion that
is currently unlawful.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 20-16-602 is repealed.
20-16-602. Right-to-Know-and-See Act — Right to view ultrasound image
before abortion — Definitions.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Right-to-
Know-and-See Act”.
(b) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing any
instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman, with
knowledge that the termination by any of those means will with reasonable
likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section is
not an abortion if the act is performed with the intent to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child or the pregnant woman;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Attempt to perform or induce an abortion” means an act or
an omission of a statutorily required act that, under the circumstances as
the actor believes them to be, constitutes a substantial step in a course of
conduct planned to culminate in the performance or induction of an abortion
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
in this state in violation of this section;
(3)(A) “Medical emergency” means a condition that, in reasonable
medical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of the pregnant woman
that it necessitates the abortion of her pregnancy to avert:
(i) The death of the pregnant woman; or
(ii) Serious risk of substantial and irreversible
physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including psychological
or emotional conditions.
(B) “Medical emergency” does not include a condition based
on a claim or diagnosis that a pregnant woman will engage in conduct that she
intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical
impairment of a major bodily function;
(4) “Qualified technician” means:
(A) A registered diagnostic medical sonographer who is
certified in obstetrics and gynecology by the American Registry for
Diagnostic Medical Sonography; or
(B) A certified nurse midwife or advanced practice
registered nurse with certification in obstetrical ultrasonography;
(5) “Reasonable medical judgment” means a medical judgment that
would be made by a reasonably prudent physician knowledgeable about the case
and the treatment possibilities with respect to the medical conditions
involved; and
(6) “Unborn child” means the offspring of human beings from
conception until birth.
(c)(1) An abortion provider who knowingly performs or refers for an
abortion shall comply with the requirements of this section.
(2) Before a pregnant woman gives informed consent to an
abortion or is referred for or administered any anesthesia or medication in
preparation of an abortion, the physician or qualified technician shall:
(A) Perform an obstetric ultrasound on the pregnant woman
using a method that the physician and the pregnant woman agree is best under
the circumstances;
(B)(i) Provide a simultaneous verbal explanation of what
the ultrasound is depicting that includes the presence and location of the
unborn child within the uterus and the number of unborn children depicted.
(ii) If the ultrasound image indicates that the
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
unborn child has died, the physician or qualified technician shall inform the
pregnant woman of that fact;
(C) Display the ultrasound images so that the pregnant
woman may view them and document in the pregnant woman's medical record that
the ultrasound images were displayed to the pregnant woman;
(D) Provide a medical description of the ultrasound
images, including the dimensions of the unborn child and the presence of
external members and internal organs if present and viewable; and
(E) Retain the ultrasound image with the date that the
ultrasound occurred in the pregnant woman's medical record.
(d)(1) The Department of Health shall quarterly inspect the records to
ensure compliance with this section.
(2) The department shall:
(A) Fine an abortion facility:
(i) One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for
the first violation in a thirty-six-month period;
(ii) Three thousand dollars ($3,000) for the second
violation in a thirty-six-month period; and
(iii) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the third
violation in a thirty-six-month period; and
(B) Suspend the license of an abortion facility for six
(6) months for the fourth violation in a thirty-six-month period.
(3) Upon notification from the department of a violation by a
physician, the Arkansas State Medical Board shall:
(A) Fine a physician:
(i) One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for
the first violation in a thirty-six-month period;
(ii) Three thousand dollars ($3,000) for the second
violation in a thirty-six-month period; and
(iii) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the third
violation in a thirty-six-month period; and
(B) Suspend the license of a physician for six (6) months
for the fourth violation in a thirty-six-month period.
(e)(1) This section does not:
(A) Prevent a pregnant woman from averting her eyes or
looking away from the ultrasound images required to be provided to and
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
reviewed by the pregnant woman; or
(B)(i) Apply in the case of a medical emergency.
(ii) Upon a determination by the physician that a
medical emergency exists with respect to the pregnant woman, the physician
shall certify the specific medical conditions that constitute the medical
emergency.
(iii) A physician or abortion provider that willfully
falsifies a certification under subdivision (e)(1)(B)(ii) of this section is
subject to penalties under this section.
(2) A physician or pregnant woman is not subject to a penalty if
the pregnant woman declines to look at the presented ultrasound images.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 20-16-603 is repealed.
20-16-603. Drug-induced abortions — Procedures — Penalties — Causes of
action — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Abortion” means the use or prescription of an instrument,
medicine, drug, or another substance or device to terminate the pregnancy of
a woman known to be pregnant with an intention other than to increase the
probability of a live birth, to preserve the life or health of the child
after live birth, or to remove a dead unborn child who died in utero as the
result of natural causes, accidental trauma, or a criminal assault on the
pregnant woman or her unborn child, and that causes the premature termination
of the pregnancy;
(2) “Attempt to perform or induce an abortion” means an act or
an omission of a statutorily required act that, under the circumstances as
the physician believes them to be, constitutes a substantial step toward the
performance or induction of an abortion in violation of this section;
(3) “Mifepristone” means the specific abortion-inducing drug
regimen known as RU-486; and
(4) “Physician” means a natural person licensed to practice
medicine in the State of Arkansas under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, §
17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq.
(b)(1) When mifepristone or another drug or chemical regimen is used
to induce an abortion, the initial administration of the drug or chemical
shall occur in the same room and in the physical presence of the physician
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
who prescribed, dispensed, or otherwise provided the drug or chemical to the
patient.
(2) The physician who induces the abortion, or a person acting
on behalf of the physician who induces the abortion, shall make all
reasonable efforts to ensure that the patient returns twelve (12) to eighteen
(18) days after the administration or use of mifepristone or another drug or
chemical for a follow-up visit so that the physician can confirm that the
pregnancy has been terminated and can assess the patient's medical condition.
(3) A brief description of the efforts made to comply with this
section, including the date, time, and identification by name of the person
making the efforts, shall be included in the patient's medical record.
(c) This section does not affect telemedicine practice that does not
involve the use of mifepristone or another drug or chemical to induce an
abortion.
(d)(1) If the Arkansas State Medical Board finds that a physician
licensed by the board has violated the rules of professional conduct by
performing an abortion in violation of this subchapter, the board shall
revoke the physician's license.
(2) A penalty shall not be assessed against the woman upon whom
the abortion is performed or attempted to be performed.
(e)(1)(A) A woman who receives an abortion, the father of the unborn
child who was the subject of the abortion if the father was married to the
woman who received the abortion at the time the abortion was performed, or a
maternal grandparent of the unborn child may maintain an action against the
person who performed the abortion in violation of this section for actual and
punitive damages.
(B) A woman who attempts to receive an abortion in
violation of this section may maintain an action against the person who
attempted to perform the abortion for actual and punitive damages.
(2)(A) Upon petition by any citizen in the county in which an
alleged violation of this section occurred or in which the defendant resides,
a court may enjoin a healthcare professional who has knowingly or recklessly
violated this section.
(B) An injunction under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this
section shall prevent the abortion provider from performing further abortions
in violation of this section.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(f)(1) If a judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff who
prevails in an action under subsection (e) of this section, the court shall
award reasonable attorney's fees and costs in favor of the plaintiff against
the defendant.
(2) If a judgment is rendered in favor of the defendant and the
court finds that the plaintiff's suit was frivolous and brought in bad faith,
the court shall order the plaintiff to pay reasonable attorney's fees to the
defendant.
(g) A pregnant woman who obtains or possesses mifepristone or another
drug or chemical used for the purpose of inducing an abortion to terminate
her pregnancy shall not be subject to an action under subsection (e) of this
section.
(h)(1) In a civil proceeding or action brought under this section, the
court shall determine if the anonymity of a woman who receives or attempts to
receive an abortion shall be preserved from public disclosure without her
consent.
(2)(A) Upon determining that the woman's anonymity shall be
preserved, the court shall issue an order to the parties, witnesses, and
counsel and shall direct the sealing of the record and exclusion of
individuals from courtrooms or hearing rooms to the extent necessary to
safeguard the woman's identity from public disclosure.
(B) An order under subdivision (h)(2)(A) of this section
shall be accompanied by specific written findings explaining:
(i) Why the anonymity of the woman should be
preserved from public disclosure;
(ii) Why the order is essential to that end;
(iii) How the order is narrowly tailored to serve
that interest; and
(iv) Why no reasonable, less restrictive alternative
exists.
(C) In the absence of written consent of the woman who
receives or attempts to receive an abortion, anyone other than a public
official who brings an action under subsection (e) of this section shall
bring the action under a pseudonym.
(D) This subsection does not conceal the identity of the
plaintiff or of a witness from the defendant.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(i) This section does not create or recognize a right to abortion.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 20-16-605 is repealed.
20-16-605. Reporting requirements for abortion complications —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Abortion complication” means any harmful event or
adverse outcome with respect to a patient related to an abortion that is
performed on the patient and that is diagnosed or treated by a physician or
at a healthcare facility.
(B) “Abortion complication” includes without limitation:
(i) Shock;
(ii) Uterine perforation;
(iii) Cervical laceration;
(iv) Hemorrhage;
(v) Aspiration or allergic response;
(vi) Infection;
(vii) Sepsis;
(viii) Death;
(ix) Incomplete abortion;
(x) Damage to the uterus; and
(xi) An infant born alive after an abortion
procedure; and
(2) “Healthcare facility” means a hospital, abortion facility,
or healthcare facility that provides emergency medical care.
(b) This section applies only to:
(1) A physician who:
(A) Performs at an abortion facility an abortion that
results in an abortion complication diagnosed or treated by the physician; or
(B) Diagnoses or treats at an abortion facility an
abortion complication that is the result of an abortion performed by another
physician at the abortion facility; and
(2) A healthcare facility.
(c)(1)(A) A physician described under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall electronically submit to the Department of Health a report on
each abortion complication diagnosed or treated by the physician not later
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
than the end of the third business day after the date on which the abortion
complication was diagnosed or treated.
(B) A healthcare facility described under subdivision
(b)(2) of this section shall electronically submit to the department a report
on each abortion complication diagnosed or treated by the healthcare facility
not later than the thirtieth day after the date on which the abortion
complication was diagnosed or treated.
(2) The reports described in subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall:
(A) Be submitted in the form and manner prescribed by rule
of the department;
(B) Identify the name of the physician submitting the
report or the name and type of healthcare facility submitting the report;
(C) Not identify by any means the physician performing the
abortion or the patient on whom the abortion was performed;
(D) Include the most specific, accurate, and complete
reporting for the highest level of specificity; and
(E) Include the following information, if known, for each
abortion complication:
(i) The date of the abortion that caused or may have
caused the abortion complication;
(ii) The type of abortion that caused or may have
caused the abortion complication;
(iii) The gestational age of the fetus at the time
that the abortion was performed;
(iv) The name and type of healthcare facility in
which the abortion was performed;
(v) The date the abortion complication was diagnosed
or treated;
(vi) The name and type of any healthcare facility
other than the reporting healthcare facility in which the abortion
complication was diagnosed or treated;
(vii) A description of the abortion complication;
(viii) The patient's year of birth, race, marital
status, state of residence, and county of residence;
(ix) The date of the first day of the patient's last
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
menstrual period that occurred before the date of the abortion that caused or
may have caused the abortion complication, if known;
(x) The number of previous live births of the
patient; and
(xi) The number of previous induced abortions of the
patient.
(3) An event associated with a medical procedure performed after
a natural miscarriage, spontaneous abortion, or fetal death is not subject to
reporting under this section.
(d)(1) The department shall develop and publish on the website of the
department an annual report that aggregates on a statewide basis each
abortion complication reported under this section.
(2) The annual report shall not include any duplicative data.
(e)(1) The information and records held by the department under this
section are confidential and shall not be disclosed under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.
(2) The information and records shall be released only in the
following circumstances:
(A) For statistical purposes, but only if a person,
patient, or healthcare facility is not identified;
(B) With the consent of each person, patient, and
healthcare facility identified in the information released;
(C) For the purpose of enforcing this section, to medical
personnel, appropriate state agencies, county courts, or district courts; or
(D) For the purpose of enforcing state licensing laws, to
appropriate state licensing boards.
(f)(1) A physician or healthcare facility that violates this section
is subject to a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each
violation.
(2) The Attorney General, at the request of the department or
appropriate licensing board, may file an action to recover a civil penalty
assessed under subdivision (f)(1) of this section and may recover attorney's
fees and costs incurred in bringing the civil action.
(3) Each day of a continuing violation shall constitute a
separate violation.
(4) A third separate violation of this section shall constitute
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
grounds for:
(A) Revocation or suspension of the physician's or the
healthcare facility's license, permit, registration, certificate, or other
authority; or
(B) Other disciplinary action against the physician or
healthcare facility by the appropriate licensing board.
(5) The department shall notify the Arkansas State Medical Board
of any violations of this section by a physician.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 20-16-607 is amended to read as follows:
20-16-607. In custody or guardianship of state.
(a) A state agency shall not:
(1) Consent to or approve the termination of a pregnancy for a
pregnant woman in the custody or guardianship of the state; or
(2) Authorize authorize the expenditure of state funds for the
purpose of paying for the termination of a pregnancy for a pregnant woman in
the custody of the state except to save the life of the pregnant woman, or as
required by federal law.
(b) A pregnant woman in the custody or guardianship of the state, her
family, or a third-party payer is responsible for all costs, including
transportation costs, associated with a medical appointment, or any
subsequent healthcare service determined necessary, related to the
termination of her pregnancy, except as required by federal law.
(c) A state agency may be involved in a court proceeding related to
the consideration by the court of whether to approve the termination of a
pregnancy for a pregnant woman in the custody or guardianship of the state.
(d) A state agency under this section shall report annually to the
Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee
on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor the number of any terminations of
pregnancies that occurred for women in the custody or guardianship of the
state agency.
(e)(1)(d) A state agency under this section shall promulgate rules
necessary to implement this section.
(2)(A) When adopting the initial rules to implement this
section, the final rule shall be filed with the Secretary of State for
adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(i) On or before January 1, 2020; or
(ii) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by
January 1, 2020, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(B) A state agency shall file the proposed rule with the
Legislative Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1,
2020, so that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval
before January 1, 2020.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 20-16-608 is repealed.
20-16-608. Reporting data on abortions to save life of mother.
A physician, healthcare provider, or abortion facility shall report to
the Department of Health the number of abortions performed to save the life
of the mother.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 20-16-701 is amended to read as follows:
20-16-701. Legislative intent — Construction.
(a) It is the intention of the General Assembly to regulate abortions
in a manner consistent with the decisions of the United States Supreme Court.
(b) All provisions and all terms shall be construed so as to be
consistent with those decisions protect a woman’s right to obtain abortion
services up to the point of fetal viability, as provided for in the United
States Constitution, according to the United States Supreme Court in the 1973
decision Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113, 162 (1973), with limited exceptions
following fetal viability for the health or life of the mother or in case of
rape or incest perpetrated on a minor.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 20-16-702(1), concerning the definition of
"abortion" related to the prohibition of an abortion of a viable fetus, is
amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the intentional termination of the
pregnancy of a mother with an intention other than to increase the
probability of a live birth or to remove a dead or dying fetus the use or
prescription of any instrument, medicine, drug, or other substance or device
intentionally to terminate the pregnancy of a female known to be pregnant.
(B) "Abortion" does not include the termination of a
pregnancy if the termination is intended to:
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(i) Increase the probability of a live birth;
(ii) Save the life or preserve the health of the
child after a live birth;
(iii) Remove a dead fetus caused by spontaneous
miscarriage; or
(iv) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 20-16-705(c), concerning the exceptions to
the prohibition of an abortion of a viable fetus, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) This subchapter shall not prohibit the abortion of a viable
fetus if the pregnancy is the result of rape or incest perpetrated on a minor
when documentation is presented that states that the crime has been reported
to law enforcement.
(2) The physician or abortion facility shall:
(A) File the documentation that a crime has been
reported to law enforcement in the pregnant woman's medical record; and
(B) Report to the Department of Health the number of
abortions performed because of rape or incest.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 20-16-704 is repealed.
20-16-704. Penalty.
(a) A violation of this subchapter shall be a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to allow the
charging or conviction of a woman with any criminal offense in the death of
her own unborn child in utero.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 8, is
repealed.
Subchapter 8 — Abortion — Parental Involvement Enhancement Act

20-16-801. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Parental
Involvement Enhancement Act”.

20-16-802. Legislative findings and purpose.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Immature minors often lack the ability to make fully
informed choices that take into account both immediate and long-range
consequences;
(2) The medical, emotional, and psychological consequences of
abortion are sometimes serious and can be lasting, particularly when the
minor is immature;
(3) The capacity to become pregnant and the capacity for mature
judgment concerning the wisdom of an abortion are not necessarily related;
(4) Parents ordinarily possess information essential to a
physician's exercise of his or her best medical judgment concerning the minor
daughter;
(5) Parents who are aware that their minor daughter has had an
abortion may better ensure that she receives adequate medical attention after
her abortion; and
(6) Parental consultation is usually desirable and in the best
interests of the minor.
(b) Based on the findings in subsection (a) of this section, the
General Assembly's purposes in enacting this enhancement to the State of
Arkansas's parental notice law are to further the important and compelling
state interests of:
(1) Protecting minors against their own immaturity;
(2) Fostering family unity and preserving the family as a viable
social unit;
(3) Protecting the constitutional rights of parents to rear
children who are members of their household;
(4) Reducing teenage pregnancy and abortion; and
(5) In light of the foregoing statements of purpose, allowing
for judicial bypasses of the parental notice requirement to be made only in
exceptional or rare circumstances.

20-16-803. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing an
instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman, with
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
knowledge that the termination by those means will with reasonable likelihood
cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the intent to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Coercion” means restraining or dominating the choice of a
pregnant woman by force, threat of force, or deprivation of food and shelter;
(3) “Consent” means:
(A) In the case of a pregnant woman who is less than
eighteen (18) years of age, a notarized written statement signed by the
pregnant woman and her mother, father, or legal guardian declaring that the
pregnant woman intends to seek an abortion and that her mother, father, or
legal guardian consents to the abortion; or
(B) In the case of a pregnant woman who is an incompetent
person, a notarized written statement signed by the pregnant woman's guardian
declaring that the guardian consents to the performance of an abortion upon
the pregnant woman;
(4) “Emancipated minor” means a person less than eighteen (18)
years of age who is or has been married or who has been legally emancipated;
(5) “Incompetent” means a person who has been adjudged a
disabled person and has had a guardian appointed for her;
(6) “Medical emergency” means a condition that, on the basis of
the physician's good-faith clinical judgment, complicates the medical
condition of a pregnant woman so as to necessitate the immediate abortion of
her pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will create serious
risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function;
(7) “Minor” means an individual under eighteen (18) years of
age;
(8) “Parent” means:
(A) Either parent of the pregnant woman if both parents
are living;
(B) One (1) parent of the pregnant woman if only one (1)
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
is living or if the second parent cannot be located through reasonably
diligent effort; or
(C) The court-appointed guardian or custodian if the
pregnant woman has one;
(9) “Physician” means a person licensed to practice medicine in
this state, including a medical doctor or a doctor of osteopathy; and
(10) “Pregnant woman” means a pregnant minor or pregnant
incompetent woman.

20-16-804. Notarized consent.
Except as otherwise provided in §§ 20-16-807 and 20-16-809, a physician
shall not perform an abortion upon an unempancipated minor or upon a woman
for whom a guardian or custodian has been appointed because of a finding of
incompetency unless the physician first obtains the written consent of either
parent or the legal guardian or custodian.

20-16-805. Manner of consent.
(a) A physician shall not perform an abortion upon a pregnant woman
unless:
(1) In the case of a woman who is less than eighteen (18) years
of age, he or she obtains the notarized written consent of both the pregnant
woman and one (1) of her parents or her legal guardian; or
(2) In the case of woman who is an incompetent person, the
physician first obtains the notarized written consent of her legal guardian.
(b) The notarized written consent shall include without limitation the
following information:
(1) The name and birthdate of the minor or incompetent woman;
(2) The name of the parent or legal guardian;
(3) A statement from the parent or legal guardian that he or she
is aware that the minor or incompetent woman desires an abortion and that he
or she does consent to the abortion; and
(4) The date.

20-16-806. Proof of identification and relationship to pregnant woman.
(a) The physician who performs the abortion shall obtain from the
parent or legal guardian entitled to consent:
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(1) Positive proof of identification in the form of a valid
government-issued photo identification card; and
(2) Written documentation that establishes that the parent or
legal guardian is the lawful parent or legal guardian of the pregnant woman.
(b) A photocopy of the proof of identification of the parent or legal
guardian and the written documentation that establishes the relationship of
the parent or legal guardian to the pregnant woman shall be kept in the
medical file of the pregnant woman for five (5) years past the age of
majority of the pregnant woman, but in no event less than seven (7) years.
(c) The physician who performs the abortion after receiving parental
consent under this subchapter shall execute for inclusion in the medical
record of the pregnant woman an affidavit stating the following: “I, (Insert
the name of physician who performed the abortion), certify that according to
my best information and belief, a reasonable person under similar
circumstances would rely on the information presented by both the pregnant
woman and her parent or legal guardian as sufficient evidence of identity and
relationship.”

20-16-807. Notice post-emergency.
(a)(1) Consent is not required under this subchapter if the attending
physician certifies in the medical record of the pregnant woman that a
medical emergency exists and there is insufficient time to obtain the
required consent.
(2) However, within twenty-four (24) hours after the completion
of the abortion, the physician shall notify one (1) of the parents or the
legal guardian of the minor or incompetent woman in the manner provided in
this subchapter that a medical emergency abortion was performed on the
pregnant woman and of the circumstances that warranted invocation of this
section.
(b)(1) Unless the minor or incompetent woman gives notice of her
intent to seek a judicial waiver under § 20-16-809, the physician shall
verbally inform the parent or legal guardian of the minor or incompetent
woman within twenty-four (24) hours after the performance of a medical
emergency abortion that an abortion was performed on the minor or incompetent
woman.
(2) The physician shall:
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(A) Inform the parent or legal guardian of the basis for
the certification of the physician required under subsection (a) of this
section and provide details regarding any additional risks to the pregnant
woman; and
(B) Send a written notice of the performed abortion to the
last known address of the parent or legal guardian by certified mail with
restricted delivery and return receipt requested.
(c) If the minor or incompetent woman gives notice to the physician of
her intent to seek a judicial waiver under this subchapter, the physician
shall:
(1) File a notice with a judge of a court that the minor has
given notice; and
(2) Provide the information to the court that the physician
would have been required to provide to the parent or legal guardian under
subsection (b) of this section if the minor or incompetent woman had not
given her intent to seek a judicial waiver.
(d)(1) The court shall expeditiously schedule a confidential
conference with notice to the minor or incompetent woman and the physician.
(2) If the minor or incompetent woman is able to participate in
the proceedings, the court shall advise the minor or incompetent woman that
she has the right to a court-appointed counsel and, upon her request, shall
provide the minor or incompetent with a court-appointed counsel.
(3) If the minor or incompetent woman is unable to participate
in the proceedings, the court shall appoint counsel on behalf of the minor or
incompetent woman.
(e)(1) After an appropriate hearing, the court, taking into account
the medical condition of the minor or incompetent woman, shall set a deadline
by which the minor or incompetent woman may file a petition or motion under
this subchapter.
(2) The court may subsequently extend the deadline in light of
the medical condition of the minor or incompetent woman or other equitable
considerations.
(3) If the minor or incompetent woman does not file a petition
or motion by the deadline, either in the court or in another court with a
copy filed in the original court, the court shall direct that the court clerk
provide the notice to the parent or legal guardian.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011

20-16-808. Venue.
The pregnant woman may petition a circuit court in the county in which
she resides for a waiver of the consent requirement.

20-16-809. Judicial relief from requirement.
(a) The requirements and procedures of this subchapter are available
to a pregnant woman regardless of whether the woman is a resident of the
state.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 20-16-803 — 20-16-806, if a
pregnant minor or incompetent woman does not wish to obtain the consent of
one (1) or both parents or the guardian or custodian, then:
(1)(A) The pregnant woman may petition a circuit court for a
waiver of the consent requirement and may participate in the proceedings on
her own behalf.
(B) However, the court shall advise the pregnant woman
that she has a right to a court-appointed counsel and, upon her request,
shall provide her with such counsel.
(C) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem for the
pregnant woman.
(D) A guardian ad litem appointed under this subchapter
shall act to maintain the confidentiality of the proceedings;
(2)(A) When the petitioner is a minor, the petition shall
include a statement that the minor is pregnant and unempancipated.
(B) The petition shall include a statement that consent
has not been waived and that the pregnant woman wishes to abort the fetus
without obtaining consent under this subchapter;
(3) The pregnant woman shall have the right to file her petition
in the circuit court using a pseudonym or using solely her initials;
(4)(A) The court proceedings under this section shall be
confidential and shall ensure the anonymity of the minor or incompetent
woman.
(B) All court proceedings under this section shall be
sealed and all documents related to the petition shall be confidential and
shall not be available to the public;
(5) These proceedings shall be given precedence over other
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
pending matters to the extent necessary to ensure that the court reaches a
decision promptly and without delay as to serve the best interests of the
pregnant minor or incompetent woman;
(6) The judge shall make in writing specific factual findings
and legal conclusions supporting the decision and shall order a record of the
evidence to be maintained, including the findings and conclusions of the
judge;
(7)(A) An expedited confidential appeal shall be available to
any pregnant minor or incompetent woman for whom the court denies an order
authorizing an abortion without consent.
(B) An order authorizing an abortion without consent shall
not be subject to appeal; and
(8) A filing fee shall not be required of any pregnant minor or
incompetent woman at either the trial or the appellate level.
(c)(1)(A) If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the
pregnant woman is both sufficiently mature and well-informed to decide
whether to have an abortion, the court shall:
(i) Issue an order authorizing the pregnant woman to
consent to the performance or inducement of an abortion without the consent
of a parent or legal guardian; and
(ii) Execute the required forms.
(B) If the court does not make the findings specified in
this subdivision (c)(1) or subdivision (c)(2) of this section, the court
shall dismiss the petition.
(2)(A) If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that
the pregnant woman is the victim of physical or sexual abuse by one (1) or
both of her parents or her legal guardian or that obtaining the consent of a
parent or legal guardian is not in the best interest of the pregnant woman,
the court shall issue an order authorizing the pregnant woman to consent to
the performance or inducement of an abortion without the consent of a parent
or guardian.
(B) If the court does not make the findings specified in
subdivision (c)(1) of this section or this subdivision (c)(2), the court
shall dismiss the petition.
(3) The attending physician shall report any abuse as provided
in the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(d)(1) If the pregnant woman claims to be mature and well-informed at
a proceeding held under this subchapter, the pregnant woman shall prove by
clear and convincing evidence that she is sufficiently mature and capable of
giving informed consent without obtaining consent from or giving notice to
her parent or legal guardian based on her experience level, perspective, and
judgment.
(2) In assessing the pregnant woman's experience level, the
court may consider the following relevant factors:
(A) The age of the pregnant woman;
(B) The pregnant woman's experiences working outside the
home;
(C) The pregnant woman's experiences living away from
home;
(D) The pregnant woman's experiences traveling on her own;
(E) The pregnant woman's experiences handling personal
finances;
(F) The pregnant woman's experiences making other
significant decisions; and
(G) Other relevant factors as appropriate.
(3) In assessing the pregnant woman's perspective, the court may
consider the following relevant factors:
(A) The steps that the pregnant woman took to explore her
options;
(B) To what extent she considered and weighed the
potential consequences of each option; and
(C) Other relevant factors as appropriate.
(4) In assessing the pregnant woman's judgment, the court may
consider among other relevant factors the pregnant woman's conduct since
learning of her pregnancy and her intellectual ability to understand her
options and to make an informed decision.

20-16-810. Disclosure and consent form.
(a) Physicians shall use a form created by the Department of Health to
obtain the consent required prior to performing an abortion on a pregnant
woman.
(b) A form is not valid and consent is not sufficient unless:
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(1) A parent or legal guardian initials each page of the form,
indicating that he or she has read and understands the information included
on that page;
(2) A parent or legal guardian signs the last page of the form
in front of a person who is a notary public;
(3) The pregnant woman initials each list of risks and hazards
detailed in subdivision (c)(4) of this section;
(4) The pregnant woman signs a consent statement described in
subdivision (c)(6) of this section; and
(5) The physician signs a physician declaration described in
subdivision (c)(7) of this section.
(c) The form shall include without limitation the following
information:
(1) A description of the pregnant woman's rights, including the
right to informed consent as granted by the Woman's Right to Know Act of
2001, § 20-16-901 et seq. [repealed]; and the Woman's Right-to-Know Act, §
20-16-1701 et seq.;
(2) A description of the parent or legal guardian's rights under
state law;
(3) A detailed description of the surgical procedures or medical
procedures, or both, that are planned to be performed on the pregnant woman;
(4) A detailed list of the risks and hazards related to the
surgical or medical procedures planned for the pregnant woman, including
without limitation the following risks and hazards that may occur:
(A) Infection;
(B) Blood clots;
(C) Hemorrhage;
(D) Allergic reactions;
(E) A hole in the uterus or other damage to the uterus;
(F) Sterility;
(G) Injury to the bowel or bladder;
(H) Possible hysterectomy as a result of complication or
injury during the procedure;
(I) Failure to remove all products of conception;
(J) Possible continuation of pregnancy;
(K) Cramping of the uterus or pelvic pain;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(L) Cervical laceration;
(M) Incompetent cervix;
(N) Emergency treatment for any complications; or
(O) Death;
(5) A description of additional information that shall be
provided by the physician to the pregnant woman under state law;
(6) A consent statement signed by the pregnant woman that
includes without limitation the following information individually initialed
by the pregnant woman that the pregnant woman:
(A) Understands that the doctor is going to perform an
abortion on her that will end her pregnancy and will result in the death of
her unborn child;
(B) Is not being forced to have an abortion and that she
has the choice not to have the abortion and may withdraw consent prior to the
abortion;
(C) Gives permission for the procedure;
(D) Understands that there are risks and hazards that
could affect her if she has the planned surgical or medical procedures;
(E) Has been given the opportunity to ask questions about
her condition, alternative forms of treatment, risk of nontreatment, the
procedures to be used, and the risks and hazards involved;
(F) Has been given information required by statute; and
(G) Has sufficient information to give informed consent;
(7) A physician declaration, signed by the physician, stating
that:
(A) The physician or his or her assistant has, as
required, explained the procedure and the contents of this form to the
pregnant woman and her parent or legal guardian and has answered all
questions; and
(B) To the best of the physician's knowledge, the patient
and her parent or legal guardian have been adequately informed and have
consented to the procedure;
(8) A parental consent statement that states that the signing
parent or legal guardian:
(A) Understands that the doctor signing the physician
declaration form is going to perform an abortion on the pregnant woman, which
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
will end her pregnancy and result in the death of her unborn child;
(B) Has had the opportunity to read the physician
declaration form or have it read to him or her and has initialed each page;
(C) Had the opportunity to ask questions of the physician
or the physician's assistant about the information in the physician
declaration form and the surgical and medical procedures to be performed on
the pregnant woman;
(D) Believes that he or she has sufficient information to
give informed consent; and
(E) Affirms by the parent's or legal guardian's signature
that he or she is the pregnant woman's father, mother, or legal guardian;
(9) A page for the parent's or legal guardian's signature that
shall be notarized by a notary public; and
(10) Any additional information that may be provided to a woman
under the laws of this state in order for a physician to obtain her informed
consent prior to performing an abortion.

20-16-811. Penalty.
(a) The performance of an abortion in violation of this subchapter or
failure to report under § 20-16-814 shall be a Class A misdemeanor and shall
be grounds for a civil action by a person whose consent is required.
(b) This subchapter does not allow the charging or conviction of a
woman with any criminal offense in the death of her own unborn child in
utero.
(c) Failure to comply with this subchapter shall provide a basis for:
(1) A civil action for compensatory and punitive damages which
may include a medical malpractice action under § 16-114-201 et seq.;
(2) Professional disciplinary action by the appropriate
healthcare licensing board for the suspension or revocation of a license for
a healthcare professional for at least one (1) year;
(3) Recovery for the parent of the infant or the parent or legal
guardian of the pregnant woman, if the pregnant woman is a minor, for the
wrongful death of the infant under § 16-62-102; and
(4) Injunction from future acts prohibited by this section.

20-16-812. Legislative intent.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
This subchapter is not intended to create and shall not be construed to
create an affirmative right to legal abortion.

20-16-813. When consent is not required.
A minor shall not be required to obtain consent under this subchapter
if the guardianship or custody order has expired or is otherwise no longer in
effect.

20-16-814. Additional information reported by abortion providers.
(a) In addition to other information reported by an abortion provider
to the Department of Health, the following information shall be reported for
each induced termination of pregnancy:
(1) Whether parental consent was required;
(2) Whether parental consent was obtained; and
(3) Whether a judicial waiver was obtained.
(b) The department shall revise its forms utilized by abortion
providers to report an induced termination of pregnancy by including the
reporting of information required by this section.

20-16-815. Construction.
(a) This subchapter does not create or recognize a right to abortion.
(b) It is not the intention of this subchapter to make lawful an
abortion that is currently unlawful.

20-16-816. Right of intervention.
The General Assembly, by joint resolution, may appoint one (1) or more
of its members who sponsored or cosponsored this subchapter, as a matter of
right and in his or her official capacity, to intervene to defend this law in
any case in which its constitutionality is challenged.

20-16-817. Effective date.
This subchapter takes effect on January 1, 2016.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 11, is
repealed.
Subchapter 11 — Unborn Child Pain Awareness and Prevention Act
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011

20-16-1101. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Unborn Child
Pain Awareness and Prevention Act”.

20-16-1102. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the use or prescription of any
instrument, medicine, drug, or other substance or device intentionally to
terminate the pregnancy of a female known to be pregnant.
(B) However, “abortion” does not include the termination
of a pregnancy if the termination is intended to:
(i) Increase the probability of a live birth;
(ii) Preserve the life or health of the child after
live birth; or
(iii) Remove a dead fetus who died as the result of a
spontaneous miscarriage;
(2) “Attempt to perform an abortion” means an act or an omission
of a statutorily required act that under the circumstances as the actor
believes them to be constitutes a substantial step in a course of conduct
planned to culminate in the termination of a pregnancy in this state;
(3) “Gestational age” means the age of the unborn child as
calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of the pregnant
woman;
(4) “Medical emergency” means any condition that on the basis of
the physician's good-faith clinical judgment so complicates the medical
condition of a pregnant female that:
(A) The immediate abortion of her pregnancy is necessary
to prevent her death; or
(B) A delay will create a serious risk of substantial and
irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant female;
(5) “Physician” means a person authorized or licensed to
practice medicine under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et
seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq., and a person authorized
to practice osteopathy under § 17-91-101 et seq.;
(6) “Probable gestational age” means the age that with
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
reasonable probability in the judgment of a physician will be the gestational
age of the unborn child at the time the abortion is planned to be performed;
and
(7) “Unborn child” means a member of the species Homo sapiens
from fertilization until birth.

20-16-1103. Unborn child pain awareness information.
Except in the case of a medical emergency:
(1) At least twenty-four (24) hours before an abortion is
performed on an unborn child whose probable gestational age is twenty (20)
weeks or more, the physician performing the abortion or the physician's agent
shall inform the pregnant female by telephone or in person:
(A) She has the right to review the printed materials
described in § 20-16-1105;
(B) These materials are available on a state-sponsored
website; and
(C) What the website address is;
(2) The physician or the physician's agent shall orally inform
the pregnant female that:
(A) The materials have been provided by the State of
Arkansas; and
(B) They contain information on pain in relation to the
unborn child;
(3) If the pregnant female chooses to view the materials other
than on the website, the materials shall either:
(A) Be given to her at least twenty-four (24) hours before
the abortion; or
(B) Mailed to her at least seventy-two (72) hours before
the abortion by certified mail, restricted delivery to addressee, so that the
postal employee may deliver the mail only to the pregnant female;
(4) If provisions are made to record or otherwise register
specifically whether the female does or does not choose to have the printed
materials given or mailed to her, the information required by this section
may be provided by a tape recording;
(5) The pregnant female shall certify in writing before the
abortion that:
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(A) The information described in subdivision (1) of this
section has been furnished to her; and
(B) She has been informed of her opportunity to review the
printed materials described in § 20-16-1105; and
(6) Before the abortion is performed, the physician who is to
perform the abortion or the physician's agent shall:
(A) Obtain a copy of the written certification required
under subdivision (5) of this section; and
(B) Retain it on file with the female's medical record for
at least three (3) years following the date of receipt.

20-16-1104. Unborn child pain prevention.
(a) Except in the case of a medical emergency, before an abortion is
performed on an unborn child whose gestational age is twenty (20) weeks or
more, the physician performing the abortion or the physician's agent shall
inform the pregnant female:
(1) Whether an anesthetic or analgesic would eliminate or
alleviate organic pain to the unborn child that could be caused by the
particular method of abortion to be employed; and
(2) Of the particular medical risks associated with the
particular anesthetic or analgesic.
(b) After presenting the information required in subsection (a) of
this section and with the consent of the pregnant female, the physician shall
administer the anesthetic or analgesic.

20-16-1105. Printed information.
(a)(1)(A) The Department of Health shall publish in English and in
each language that is the primary language of two percent (2%) or more of the
state's population printed materials with the following statement concerning
unborn children of twenty (20) weeks gestational age or more:
“By twenty (20) weeks gestation, the unborn child has
the physical structures necessary to experience pain. There is evidence that
by twenty (20) weeks gestation unborn children seek to evade certain stimuli
in a manner that in an infant or an adult would be interpreted to be a
response to pain. Anesthesia is routinely administered to unborn children who
are twenty (20) weeks gestational age or more who undergo prenatal surgery.”
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(B) The materials shall be objective, nonjudgmental, and
designed to convey only accurate scientific information about the human fetus
at the various gestational ages.
(2) The department shall make the materials available on the
department's website.
(3) The materials referred to in subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall be printed in a typeface large enough to be clearly legible.
(b)(1) The department's website shall be maintained at a minimum
resolution of seventy-two dots per inch (72 dpi).
(2) All pictures appearing on the website shall be a minimum of
two hundred by three hundred (200 X 300) pixels.
(3) All letters on the website shall be presented in a minimum
of 11-point type.
(4) All information and pictures shall be accessible with an
industry-standard browser that requires no additional plug-ins.
(c) Upon request, the department shall make available to any person,
facility, or hospital at no cost and in appropriate numbers the materials
required under this section.

20-16-1106. Requirements for department website.
(a) The Department of Health shall include on its website the
information described in § 20-16-1105.
(b) No information regarding persons who use the website shall be
collected or maintained.
(c) The department shall monitor the website on a daily basis to
prevent and correct tampering.

20-16-1107. Procedure in case of medical emergency.
If a medical emergency compels a physician to perform an abortion, the
physician shall inform the pregnant female before the abortion is performed,
if possible, of the medical indications supporting the physician's judgment
that:
(1) An abortion is necessary to prevent her death; or
(2) A twenty-four-hour delay will create a serious risk of
substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the
pregnant female.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011

20-16-1108. Reporting.
(a) The Department of Health shall prepare a reporting form for
physicians containing a reprint of this subchapter and listing:
(1)(A) The number of females to whom the physician or an agent
of the physician provided the information described in § 20-16-1103(1).
(B) Of that number, the number provided by telephone and
the number provided in person.
(C) Of each of the numbers described in this subdivision
(a)(1) and subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the number provided in the
capacity of:
(i) A physician who is to perform the abortion; or
(ii) An agent of the physician;
(2) The number of females who did not avail themselves of the
opportunity to obtain a copy other than on the website of the printed
information described in § 20-16-1105;
(3) The number who, to the best of the reporting physician's
information and belief, went on to obtain the abortion;
(4) The number of abortions performed by the physician for which
information otherwise required to be provided at least twenty-four (24) hours
before the abortion was not so provided because an immediate abortion was
necessary to prevent the female's death; and
(5) The number of abortions for which information otherwise
required to be provided at least twenty-four (24) hours before the abortion
information was not so provided because a delay would create serious risk of
substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of the
pregnant female.
(b) The department shall ensure that copies of the reporting forms
described in subsection (a) of this section are provided:
(1) Within one hundred twenty (120) days after August 12, 2005,
to all physicians licensed to practice in this state;
(2) To each physician who subsequently becomes newly licensed to
practice in this state, at the same time as official notification to that
physician that the physician is so licensed; and
(3) By December 1 of each year after the calendar year in which
this subchapter becomes effective, to all physicians licensed to practice in
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
this state.
(c) By February 28 of each year following a calendar year in any part
of which this subchapter was in effect, each physician who provided or whose
agent provided information to one (1) or more females in accordance with §
20-16-1103 during the previous calendar year shall submit to the department a
copy of the form described in subsection (a) of this section with the
requested data entered accurately and completely.
(d)(1) For each of the items listed in subsection (a) of this section,
the department shall issue by June 30 of each year a public report providing
statistics compiled by the department on the basis of reports for the
previous calendar year submitted in accordance with this section.
(2) Each report shall also provide the statistics for all
previous calendar years, adjusted to reflect any additional information from
late or corrected reports.
(3) The department shall ensure that none of the information
included in the public reports could reasonably lead to the identification of
any individual providing or provided information in accordance with § 20-16-
1103(1) or § 20-16-1103(2).
(e) So long as reporting forms are sent to all licensed physicians in
the state at least one (1) time every year and the report described in this
section is issued at least one (1) time every year, the department, in order
to achieve administrative convenience or fiscal savings, or to reduce the
burden of reporting requirements, may:
(1) Alter any of the dates established in this section; or
(2) Consolidate the forms or reports described in this section
with other forms or reports issued by the department.
(f)(1) The department shall assess against a physician who fails to
submit a report required under this section within thirty (30) days after the
due date a fee of five hundred dollars ($500) for each additional thirty-day
period or portion of a thirty-day period during which the report is overdue.
(2)(A) If a physician who is required to report under this
section has not submitted a report or has submitted an incomplete report more
than one (1) year following the due date of the report, the department may
bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to seek an order
requiring the physician to submit a complete report within a period
established by the court.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(B) Failure of the physician to file the complete report
within the court-ordered period is punishable as civil contempt.

20-16-1109. Penalties.
(a) A person who knowingly or recklessly performs or attempts to
perform a termination of a pregnancy in violation of this subchapter or who
fails to report under § 20-16-1108 shall be subject to disciplinary action by
the Arkansas State Medical Board and is guilty upon conviction of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(b) A penalty shall not be assessed against the woman upon whom the
abortion is performed or attempted to be performed.
(c) A penalty or civil liability shall not be assessed for failure to
comply with any provision of this subchapter unless the Department of Health
has made the printed materials available at the time that the physician or
the physician's agent is required to inform the woman of her right to review
them.

20-16-1110. Civil remedies.
(a) An action seeking actual and punitive damages may be brought
against a person who performed an abortion in knowing or reckless violation
of this subchapter by:
(1) Any person upon whom the abortion was performed;
(2) The father of the unborn child who was the subject of the
abortion; or
(3) A grandparent of the unborn child who was the subject of the
abortion.
(b) Any female upon whom an abortion has been attempted in violation
of this subchapter may bring an action for actual and punitive damages
against a person who attempted to perform the abortion in knowing or reckless
violation of this subchapter.
(c)(1) If the Department of Health fails to issue the public report
required under § 20-16-1108, any group of ten (10) or more citizens of this
state may seek an injunction in a court of competent jurisdiction against the
Secretary of the Department of Health requiring that a complete report be
issued within a period established by the court.
(2) Failure of the secretary to obey an injunction issued under
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
subdivision (c)(1) of this section is punishable as civil contempt.
(d)(1) If judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action
described in this section, the court shall assess a reasonable attorney's fee
in favor of the plaintiff against the defendant.
(2) If judgment is rendered in favor of the defendant and if the
court finds that the plaintiff's suit was frivolous and brought in bad faith,
the court shall assess a reasonable attorney's fee in favor of the defendant
against the plaintiff.

20-16-1111. Protection of privacy in court proceedings.
(a) In every civil or criminal action brought under this subchapter in
which any female upon whom an abortion has been performed or attempted has
not given her consent to disclosure of her identity, the court shall
determine whether the anonymity of the female shall be preserved from public
disclosure.
(b)(1) The court, upon motion or sua sponte, shall make a ruling on
preserving the anonymity of the female.
(2) If the court determines that the female's anonymity should
be preserved, that court shall:
(A) Issue appropriate orders to the parties, witnesses,
and counsel;
(B) Direct the sealing of the record; and
(C) Order the exclusion of individuals from courtrooms or
hearing rooms to the extent necessary to safeguard the anonymity of the
female.
(3) Each order issued under subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) of this
section shall be accompanied by specific written findings explaining:
(A) Why the anonymity of the female should be preserved
from public disclosure;
(B) Why the order is essential to that end;
(C) Why no reasonable less restrictive alternative exists;
and
(D) How the order is narrowly tailored to preserve the
anonymity of the female.
(c) In the absence of written consent of the female upon whom an
abortion has been performed or attempted, anyone other than a public official
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
who brings an action under § 20-16-1110(a) shall do so under a pseudonym.
(d) This section may not be construed to conceal the identity of the
plaintiff or witnesses from the defendant.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 13, is
repealed.
Subchapter 13 — Arkansas Human Heartbeat Protection Act

20-16-1301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Human
Heartbeat Protection Act”.

20-16-1302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Contraceptive” means a device, drug, or chemical that
prevents fertilization;
(2) “Fetus” means the human offspring developing during
pregnancy from the moment of fertilization and includes the embryonic stage
of development;
(3) “Heartbeat” means cardiac activity, the steady and
repetitive rhythmic contraction of the fetal heart within the gestational
sac;
(4) “Human individual” means an individual organism of the
species Homo sapiens;
(5) “Major bodily function” includes without limitation
functions of the immune system, normal cell growth, and digestive, bowel,
bladder, neurological, brain, respiratory, circulatory, endocrine, and
reproductive functions;
(6) “Medical emergency” means a condition in which an abortion
is necessary:
(A) To preserve the life of the pregnant woman whose life
is endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury,
including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the
pregnancy itself, or when continuation of the pregnancy will create a serious
risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function of
the pregnant woman; or
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(B) Due to the existence of a highly lethal fetal disorder
as defined by the Arkansas State Medical Board;
(7) “Pregnancy” means the human female reproductive condition
that begins with fertilization when the female is carrying the developing
human offspring and is calculated from the first day of the last menstrual
period of the human female; and
(8) “Viability” means a medical condition that begins with a
detectible fetal heartbeat.

20-16-1303. Testing for heartbeat.
(a) A person authorized to perform abortions under Arkansas law shall
not perform an abortion on a pregnant woman before the person tests the
pregnant woman to determine whether the fetus that the pregnant woman is
carrying possesses a detectible heartbeat.
(b)(1) A person authorized to perform abortions under Arkansas law
shall perform an abdominal ultrasound test necessary to detect a heartbeat of
an unborn human individual according to standard medical practice, including
the use of medical devices as determined by standard medical practice.
(2) Tests performed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall be approved by the Arkansas State Medical Board.
(c) The Arkansas State Medical Board shall adopt rules:
(1)(A) Based on standard medical practice for testing for the
fetal heartbeat of an unborn human individual.
(B) Rules adopted under this subsection shall specify that
a test for fetal heartbeat is not required in the case of a medical
emergency; and
(2) To define, based on available medical evidence, the
statistical probability of bringing an unborn human individual to term based
on the gestational age of the unborn human individual possessing a detectible
heartbeat.
(d) If a fetal heartbeat is detected during the test required under
this section, the person performing the test shall inform the pregnant woman
in writing:
(1) That the unborn human individual that the pregnant woman is
carrying possesses a heartbeat;
(2) Of the statistical probability of bringing the unborn human
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
individual to term based on the gestational age of the unborn human
individual possessing a detectible heartbeat; and
(3) An abortion is prohibited under § 20-16-1304.
(e) If a heartbeat has been detected, the pregnant woman shall sign a
form acknowledging that she has received the information required under
subsection (d) of this section.

20-16-1304. Prohibitions.
(a) A person authorized to perform abortions under Arkansas law shall
not perform an abortion on a pregnant woman with the specific intent of
causing or abetting the termination of the life of an unborn human individual
whose heartbeat has been detected under § 20-16-1303 and is twelve (12) weeks
or greater gestation.
(b) A violation of this section as determined by the Arkansas State
Medical Board shall result in the revocation of the medical license of the
person authorized to perform abortions under Arkansas law.

20-16-1305. Exemptions — Medical personnel.
(a) A person does not violate this subchapter if the person:
(1) Performs a medical procedure designed to or intended to
prevent the death of a pregnant woman or in reasonable medical judgment to
preserve the life of the pregnant woman;
(2)(A) Has undertaken an examination for the presence of a
heartbeat in the fetus utilizing standard medical practice; and
(B) The examination does not reveal a heartbeat; or
(3) Has been informed by a medical professional who has
undertaken the examination for fetal heartbeat that the examination did not
reveal a fetal heartbeat.
(b) This subchapter does not apply to:
(1) An abortion performed to save the life of the mother;
(2)(A) A pregnancy that results from rape under § 5-14-103 or
incest under § 5-26-202 when documentation is presented that states that the
crime has been reported to law enforcement.
(B) The physician or abortion facility shall:
(i) File the documentation that a crime has been
reported to law enforcement in the pregnant woman's medical record; and
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(ii) Report to the Department of Health the number of
abortions performed because of rape or incest; or
(3) A medical emergency.

20-16-1306. Exemptions.
This subchapter does not:
(1) Subject a pregnant female on whom an abortion is performed
or attempted to be performed to any criminal prosecution or civil penalty; or
(2) Prohibit the sale, use, prescription, or administration of a
measure, drug, or chemical designed for contraceptive purposes.

20-16-1307. Tolling of effective date.
If a state or federal court of competent jurisdiction voids a provision
of this subchapter as unconstitutional, the effective date of that provision
shall be tolled until that provision has been upheld as valid by an appellate
tribunal.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 14, is
repealed.
Subchapter 14 — Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act

20-16-1401. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Pain-Capable
Unborn Child Protection Act”.

20-16-1402. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Abortion” means the use or prescription of any instrument,
medicine, drug, or any other substance or device:
(A) To terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be
pregnant with an intention other than to:
(i) Increase the probability of a live birth;
(ii) Preserve the life or health of the child after
live birth; or
(iii) Remove a dead unborn child who died as the
result of natural causes in utero, accidental trauma, or a criminal assault
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
on the pregnant woman or her unborn child; and
(B) Which causes the premature termination of the
pregnancy;
(2) “Attempt to perform or induce an abortion” means an act or
an omission of a statutorily required act, that under the circumstances as
the actor believes them to be, constitutes a substantial step in a course of
conduct planned to culminate in the performance or induction of an abortion
in this state in violation of this subchapter;
(3) “Fertilization” means the fusion of a human spermatozoon
with a human ovum;
(4)(A) “Medical emergency” means a condition that, in reasonable
medical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of the pregnant woman
that it necessitates the immediate abortion of her pregnancy:
(i) Without first determining post-fertilization age
to avert the death of the pregnant woman; or
(ii) For which the delay necessary to determine post-
fertilization age will create serious risk of substantial and irreversible
physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including psychological
or emotional conditions.
(B) “Medical emergency” does not include a condition based
on a claim or diagnosis that a pregnant woman will engage in conduct which
she intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible
physical impairment of a major bodily function;
(5) “Physician” means any person licensed to practice medicine
and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in this state;
(6) “Post-fertilization age” means the age of the unborn child
as calculated from the fertilization of the human ovum;
(7) “Probable post-fertilization age of the unborn child” means
what, in reasonable medical judgment, will, with reasonable probability, be
the post-fertilization age of the unborn child at the time the abortion is
planned to be performed or induced;
(8) “Reasonable medical judgment” means a medical judgment that
would be made by a reasonably prudent physician knowledgeable about the case
and the treatment possibilities with respect to the medical conditions
involved;
(9) “Unborn child” means an individual organism of the species
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
Homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth; and
(10) “Woman” means a female human being whether or not she has
reached the age of majority.

20-16-1403. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Pain receptors known as nociceptors are present throughout
the unborn child's entire body by no later than sixteen (16) weeks after
fertilization, and nerves link these receptors to the brain's thalamus and
subcortical plate by no later than twenty (20) weeks;
(2)(A) By eight (8) weeks after fertilization, the unborn child
reacts to touch.
(B) After twenty (20) weeks after fertilization, the
unborn child reacts to stimuli that would be recognized as painful if applied
to an adult human, for example, by recoiling;
(3) In the unborn child, application of such painful stimuli is
associated with significant increases in stress hormones known as the stress
response;
(4) Subjection to such painful stimuli is associated with long-
term harmful neurodeveolopmental effects, such as altered pain sensitivity
and, possibly, emotional, behavioral, and learning disabilities later in
life;
(5) For the purposes of surgery on unborn children, fetal
anesthesia is routinely administered and is associated with a decrease in
stress hormones compared to those levels when painful stimuli are applied
without such anesthesia;
(6)(A) The position, asserted by some medical experts, that the
unborn child is incapable of experiencing pain until a point later in
pregnancy than twenty (20) weeks after fertilization predominately rests on
the assumption that the ability to experience pain depends on the cerebral
cortex and requires nerve connections between the thalamus and the cortex.
(B) However, recent medical research and analysis,
especially since 2007, provide strong evidence for the conclusion that a
functioning cortex is not necessary to experience pain;
(7) Substantial evidence indicates that children born missing
the bulk of the cerebral cortex, those with hydranencephaly, nevertheless
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
experience pain;
(8) In adults, stimulation or ablation of the cerebral cortex
does not alter pain perception, while stimulation or ablation of the thalamus
does;
(9) Substantial evidence indicates that structures used for pain
processing in early development differ from those of adults and use different
neural elements available at specific times during development, such as the
subcortical plate, to fulfill the role of pain processing;
(10) Consequently, there is substantial medical evidence that an
unborn child is capable of experiencing pain by twenty (20) weeks after
fertilization;
(11) It is the purpose of the state to assert a compelling state
interest in protecting the lives of unborn children from the stage at which
substantial medical evidence indicates that they are capable of feeling pain;
and
(12) Mindful of Leavitt v. Jane L., 518 U.S. 137 (1996), in which
in the context of determining the severability of a state statute regulating
abortion, the United States Supreme Court noted that an explicit statement of
legislative intent specifically made applicable to a particular statute is of
greater weight than a general savings or severability clause, it is the
intent of the state that § 1-2-117 be specifically applied to this
subchapter, and moreover the General Assembly declares that it would have
passed this subchapter, and each section, subsection, subdivision, sentence,
clause, phrase, or word in this subchapter, irrespective of the fact that any
one (1) or more sections, subsections, subdivisions, sentences, clauses,
phrases, or words, or any of their applications, were to be declared
unconstitutional.

20-16-1404. Determination of post-fertilization age.
(a)(1) Except in the case of a medical emergency, an abortion shall
not be performed or induced or be attempted to be performed or induced unless
the physician performing or inducing the abortion has first made a
determination of the probable post-fertilization age of the unborn child or
relied upon such a determination made by another physician.
(2) In making such a determination under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section, the physician shall make such inquiries of the woman and
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
perform or cause to be performed such medical examinations and tests as a
reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and the medical
conditions involved, would consider necessary to accurately diagnose the
probable post-fertilization age of the unborn child.
(b) Any physician who purposely, knowingly, or recklessly fails to
conform to any requirement of this section engages in unprofessional conduct
under § 17-95-409(a)(2)(D).

20-16-1405. Abortion of unborn child of 20 or more weeks post-
fertilization age prohibited.
(a)(1) A person shall not perform or induce or attempt to perform or
induce an abortion upon a woman when it has been determined by the physician
performing or inducing or attempting to perform or induce the abortion or by
another physician upon whose determination that physician relies that the
probable post-fertilization age of the unborn child of the woman is twenty
(20) or more weeks.
(2)(A) However, subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not
apply if, in reasonable medical judgment, the pregnant woman has a condition
which so complicates her medical condition as to necessitate the abortion of
her pregnancy to avert her death or to avert serious risk of substantial and
irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant
woman, not including psychological or emotional conditions.
(B) A condition creating an exemption under subdivision
(a)(2)(A) of this section shall not be deemed to exist if the condition is
based on a claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct that she
intends to result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical
impairment of a major bodily function.
(3)(A) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not apply if the
pregnancy results from rape under § 5-14-103 or incest under § 5-26-202 when
documentation is presented that states that the crime has been reported to
law enforcement.
(B) The physician or abortion facility shall:
(i) File the documentation that a crime has been
reported to law enforcement in the pregnant woman's medical record; and
(ii) Report to the Department of Health the number of
abortions performed because of rape or incest.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(b)(1) When an abortion upon a woman whose unborn child has been
determined under subdivision (a)(1) of this section to have a probable post-
fertilization age of twenty (20) or more weeks is not prohibited by this
section, the physician shall terminate the pregnancy in the manner which, in
reasonable medical judgment, provides the best opportunity for the unborn
child to survive.
(2)(A) However, subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not
apply if, in reasonable medical judgment, termination of the pregnancy in
that manner would pose a greater risk either of the death of the pregnant
woman or of the substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major
bodily function of the woman, not including psychological or emotional
conditions, than would other available methods.
(B) A risk creating an exemption under subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section shall not be deemed to exist if it is based on a
claim or diagnosis that the woman will engage in conduct that she intends to
result in her death or in substantial and irreversible physical impairment of
a major bodily function.

20-16-1406. Reporting.
(a)(1) A physician who performs or induces or attempts to perform or
induce an abortion shall report to the Department of Health on a schedule and
in accordance with rules adopted by the department.
(2) The report required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall include without limitation:
(A) Whether a determination of probable post-fertilization
age was made, the probable post-fertilization age of the unborn child
determined, and the method and basis of the determination;
(B) If a determination of probable post-fertilization age
of the unborn child was not made, the basis of the determination that a
medical emergency existed;
(C) If the probable post-fertilization age of the unborn
child was determined to be twenty (20) or more weeks, the basis of the
determination that the pregnant woman had a condition which so complicated
her medical condition as to necessitate the immediate abortion of her
pregnancy to avert her death or to avert serious risk of substantial and
irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
woman, not including psychological or emotional conditions;
(D) The method used for the abortion; and
(E) If an abortion was performed when the probable post-
fertilization age of the unborn child was determined to be twenty (20) or
more weeks:
(i) Whether the method used was one that in
reasonable medical judgment provided the best opportunity for the unborn
child to survive; or
(ii) If such a method under subdivision (a)(2)(E)(i)
of this section was not used, the basis of the determination that termination
of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk either of the death
of the pregnant woman or of the substantial and irreversible physical
impairment of a major bodily function of the woman, not including
psychological or emotional conditions, than would other available methods.
(b)(1) By June 30 of each year the department shall issue a public
report providing statistics for the previous calendar year compiled from all
of the reports covering that year submitted under this section for each of
the items listed in subsection (a) of this section.
(2) Each report also shall provide the statistics for all
previous calendar years during which this section was in effect, adjusted to
reflect any additional information from late or corrected reports.
(3) The department shall take care to ensure that none of the
information included in the public reports could reasonably lead to the
identification of any pregnant woman upon whom an abortion was performed or
induced or attempted to be performed or induced.
(c)(1) A physician who fails to submit a report by the end of thirty
(30) days after the date the report is due shall be subject to a late fee of
five hundred dollars ($500) for each additional thirty-day period or portion
of a thirty-day period the report is overdue.
(2) A physician required to report in accordance with this
subchapter who has not submitted a report or has submitted only an incomplete
report more than one (1) year following the date the report is due, in an
action brought in the manner in which actions are brought by the department,
may be directed by a court of competent jurisdiction to submit a complete
report within a period stated by court order or be subject to civil contempt.
(d)(1) Purposeful, knowing, or reckless failure by a physician to
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
conform to any requirement of this section, other than late filing of a
report, constitutes unprofessional conduct under § 17-95-409.
(2) Purposeful, knowing, or reckless failure by a physician to
submit a complete report in accordance with a court order constitutes
unprofessional conduct under § 17-95-409.
(3) Purposeful, knowing, or reckless falsification of any report
required under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.
(e) Within ninety (90) days after the effective date of this
subchapter, the department shall adopt rules to assist in compliance with
this section, and subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall take effect so as
to require reports regarding all abortions performed or induced on or after
the first day of the first calendar month following the effective date of
such rules.

20-16-1407. Criminal penalties.
(a) A person who purposely, knowingly, or recklessly performs or
induces or attempts to perform or induce an abortion in violation of this
subchapter is guilty of a Class D felony.
(b) A penalty may not be assessed against the woman upon whom the
abortion is performed or induced or attempted to be performed or induced.

20-16-1408. Civil remedies.
(a)(1) A woman upon whom an abortion has been performed in violation
of this subchapter or the father of the unborn child who was the subject of
an abortion in violation of this subchapter may bring an action against the
person who purposely, knowingly, or recklessly performed or induced the
abortion in violation of this subchapter for actual and punitive damages.
(2) A woman upon whom an abortion has been attempted in
violation of this subchapter may bring an action against the person who
attempted purposely, knowingly, or recklessly to perform or induce the
abortion in violation of this subchapter for actual and punitive damages.
(b)(1) A cause of action for injunctive relief against a person who
has purposely, knowingly, or recklessly violated this subchapter may be
maintained by:
(A) The woman upon whom an abortion was performed or
induced or attempted to be performed or induced in violation of this
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
subchapter;
(B) A person who is the spouse, parent, sibling, or
guardian of or a current or former licensed healthcare provider of the woman
upon whom an abortion has been performed or induced or attempted to be
performed or induced in violation of this subchapter;
(C) A prosecuting attorney with appropriate jurisdiction;
or
(D) The Attorney General.
(2) The injunction shall prevent the abortion provider from
performing or inducing and from attempting to perform or induce further
abortions in violation of this subchapter.
(c) If judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff in an action
described in this section, the court shall also render judgment for a
reasonable attorney's fee in favor of the plaintiff against the defendant.
(d) If judgment is rendered in favor of the defendant and the court
finds that the plaintiff's suit was frivolous and brought in bad faith, the
court shall render judgment for a reasonable attorney's fee in favor of the
defendant against the plaintiff.
(e) Damages or attorney's fee shall not be assessed against the woman
upon whom an abortion was performed or induced or attempted to be performed
or induced except under subsection (d) of this section.

20-16-1409. Protection of privacy in court proceedings.
(a) In every civil or criminal proceeding or action brought under this
subchapter, the court shall rule whether the anonymity of a woman upon whom
an abortion has been performed or induced or attempted to be performed or
induced shall be preserved from public disclosure if she does not give her
consent to the disclosure.
(b) The court, upon motion or sua sponte, shall make a ruling under
subsection (a) of this section and, upon determining that the woman's
anonymity should be preserved, shall issue orders to the parties, witnesses,
and counsel and shall direct the sealing of the record and exclusion of
individuals from courtrooms or hearing rooms to the extent necessary to
safeguard the woman's identity from public disclosure.
(c) Each order under subsection (b) of this section shall be
accompanied by specific written findings explaining:
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(1) Why the anonymity of the woman should be preserved from
public disclosure;
(2) Why the order is essential to that end;
(3) How the order is narrowly tailored to serve that interest;
and
(4) Why no reasonable less restrictive alternative could be
fashioned.
(d) In the absence of written consent of the woman upon whom an
abortion has been performed or induced or attempted to be performed or
induced, anyone other than a public official who brings an action under § 20-
16-1408 shall do so under a pseudonym.
(e) This section is not intended to conceal the identity of the
plaintiff or of witnesses from the defendant or from attorneys for the
defendant.

20-16-1410. Construction.
(a) Since it is the intent of the state to assert two (2) separate and
independent compelling state interests, those in protecting the lives of
viable unborn children and protecting the lives of unborn children from the
stage at which substantial medical evidence indicates that they are capable
of feeling pain, this subchapter does not repeal by implication or otherwise
§ 20-16-705.
(b) This subchapter does not repeal by implication or otherwise any
other provision of this chapter.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 20-16-1502 is repealed.
20-16-1502. Legislative findings and purpose.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The use of abortion-inducing drugs, including the Mifeprex
regimen, also known as “RU-486” or “mifepristone”, presents significant
medical risks, including without limitation incomplete abortion, sepsis or
other infections, uterine hemorrhage, blood clots, abdominal pain, fever,
vomiting, headache, fatigue, pelvic inflammatory disease, and death;
(2) Medical evidence demonstrates that women who use abortion-
inducing drugs risk significantly more complications than those who undergo
surgical abortions;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(3) The risk of complications, as well as the failure rate for
drug-induced abortions, increases with advancing gestational age;
(4) A woman's ability to provide informed consent depends on the
extent to which the woman receives information sufficient to make an informed
choice;
(5) The decision to abort “is an important, and often a
stressful one, and it is desirable and imperative that it be made with full
knowledge of its nature and consequences”, as stated in Planned Parenthood v.
Danforth, 428 U.S. 52, 67 (1976);
(6) To facilitate reliable scientific studies and research on
the safety and efficacy of abortion-inducing drugs, it is essential that the
medical and public health communities have access to accurate information on
the efficacy of abortion-inducing drugs and resulting complications;
(7) Abortion “recordkeeping and reporting requirements that are
reasonably directed to the preservation of maternal health and that properly
respect a patient's confidentiality and privacy are permissible”, as stated
in Planned Parenthood v. Danforth, 428 U.S. 52, 80 (1976); and
(8) “The collection of information with respect to actual
patients is a vital element of medical research, and so it cannot be said
that the [abortion reporting] requirements serve no purpose other than to
make abortions more difficult”, as stated in Planned Parenthood v. Casey, 505
U.S. 833, 900-901 (1992).
(b) Based on the findings in subsection (a) of this section, it is the
purpose of this subchapter to:
(1) Protect the health and welfare of every woman considering a
drug-induced abortion;
(2) Ensure that:
(A) A physician examines a woman before prescribing,
administering, or dispensing an abortion-inducing drug; and
(B) A woman considering a drug-induced abortion receives
comprehensive information on abortion-inducing drugs;
(3) Reduce “the risk that a woman may elect an abortion, only to
discover later, with devastating psychological consequences, that her
decision was not fully informed”, as stated in Planned Parenthood v. Casey,
505 U.S. 833, 882 (1992); and
(4) Add to the sum of medical and public health knowledge
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
through the compilation of relevant data on drug-induced abortions performed
in the state, as well as on all medical complications and maternal deaths
resulting from these abortions.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 20-16-1505 is repealed.
20-16-1505. Reporting.
(a) If a physician provides an abortion-inducing drug to another for
the purpose of inducing an abortion as authorized in § 20-16-1504 and if the
physician knows that the woman who uses the abortion-inducing drug for the
purpose of inducing an abortion experiences an adverse event, the physician
shall provide a written report of the adverse event within three (3) days of
the event to the United States Food and Drug Administration via the MedWatch
program reporting system and to the Arkansas State Medical Board.
(b)(1) The board shall compile and retain all reports it receives
under this section.
(2)(A) All reports received by the board are public records open
to inspection under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et
seq.
(B) The board shall not release to any person or entity
the name or any other personal identifying information regarding a person
who:
(i) Uses an abortion-inducing drug to induce an
abortion; and
(ii) Is the subject of a report received by the board
under this section.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 20-16-1506 is repealed.
20-16-1506. Criminal penalties.
(a) A person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly violates a
provision of this subchapter is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) A criminal penalty may not be assessed against the pregnant woman
upon whom the drug-induced abortion is performed.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 20-16-1507(f) is repealed.
(f) Upon a finding of the Arkansas State Medical Board that a
physician failed to comply with the requirements of this subchapter, the
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
board shall revoke the physician's medical license.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 16, is
repealed.
Subchapter 16 — Advancing Women's Health Act of 2015

20-16-1601. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing an
instrument, medicine, drug, device, or another substance or means with the
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman with
knowledge that the termination by those means will with reasonable likelihood
cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the intent to:
(i) Save the life of the mother;
(ii) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
(iii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by
spontaneous abortion; or
(iv) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Abortion referral” means the act of recommending a pregnant
woman to a doctor, clinic, or other person or entity for the purpose of
obtaining or learning about obtaining an abortion;
(3) “Affiliate” means an individual or entity that, directly or
indirectly, owns, controls, is controlled by, or is under the common control
of another person or entity, in whole or in part, or a subsidiary, parent, or
sibling entity;
(4) “Pregnancy” means the female reproductive condition of
having an unborn child in the woman's uterus; and
(5) “Unborn child” means the offspring of human beings from
fertilization until birth.

20-16-1602. Awarding of public funds to entities that perform
abortions prohibited.
(a) An agency or instrumentality of the state shall not award a grant
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
to pay the direct or indirect costs of performing, inducing, referring, or
counseling in favor of abortions, including without limitation:
(1) Administrative costs and expenses;
(2) Overhead costs;
(3) Employee salaries;
(4) Rent and mortgage payments; and
(5) Telephone and other utility payments.
(b) An agency or instrumentality of the state shall not grant,
appropriate, or distribute a grant to an individual or entity that:
(1) Performs abortions, induces abortions, provides abortion
referrals, or counsels in favor of elective abortions; or
(2) Is an affiliate of a person or entity that performs
abortions, induces abortions, provides abortion referrals, or counsels in
favor of elective abortions.

20-16-1603. Construction.
(a)(1) This subchapter does not affect the funding of a hospital,
medical school, or university.
(2) The restrictions under § 20-16-1602 apply to funding
available through the Arkansas Medicaid Program.
(b) This subchapter does not create or recognize:
(1) A right to an abortion; or
(2) A right to public funds, a contract, or a grant.

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 17, is
repealed.
Subchapter 17 — Woman's Right-to-Know Act

20-16-1701. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Woman's Right-
to-Know Act”.

20-16-1702. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing any
instrument, medicine, drug, or other substance, device, or means with the
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman with
knowledge that the termination by those means will with reasonable likelihood
cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) A use, prescription, or means under this subdivision
(1) is not an abortion if the use, prescription, or means is performed with
the intent to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2)(A) “Abortion-inducing drug” means a medicine, drug, or any
other substance prescribed or dispensed with the intent of terminating the
clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman with knowledge that the
termination will with reasonable likelihood cause the death of the unborn
child.
(B) “Abortion-inducing drugs” includes off-label use of
drugs known to have abortion-inducing properties, which are prescribed
specifically with the intent of causing an abortion, such as misoprostol,
Cytotec, and methotrexate.
(C) This definition does not apply to drugs that may be
known to cause an abortion but which are prescribed for other medical
indications such as chemotherapeutic agents or diagnostic drugs.
(D) Use of drugs to induce abortion is also known as a
medical, drug-induced, or chemical abortion;
(3) “Adverse event” means an undesirable experience associated
with the use of a medical product in a patient, including without limitation
an event that causes:
(A) Death;
(B) Threat to life;
(C) Hospitalization;
(D) Disability or permanent damage;
(E) Congenital anomaly or birth defect, or both;
(F) Required intervention to prevent permanent impairment
or damage; or
(G) Other serious important medical events, including
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
without limitation:
(i) Allergic bronchospasm requiring treatment in an
emergency room;
(ii) Serious blood dyscrasias;
(iii) Seizures or convulsions that do not result in
hospitalization; and
(iv) The development of drug dependence or drug
abuse;
(4) “Complication” means an adverse physical or psychological
condition arising from the performance of an abortion, including without
limitation:
(A) An adverse reaction to anesthesia or other drugs;
(B) Bleeding;
(C) A blood clot;
(D) Cardiac arrest;
(E) Cervical perforation;
(F) Coma;
(G) Embolism;
(H) Endometritis;
(I) Failure to actually terminate the pregnancy;
(J) Free fluid in the abdomen;
(K) Hemorrhage;
(L) Incomplete abortion, also referred to as “retained
tissue”;
(M) Infection;
(N) Metabolic disorder;
(O) Undiagnosed ectopic pregnancy;
(P) Placenta previa in subsequent pregnancies;
(Q) Pelvic inflammatory disease;
(R) A psychological or emotional complication such as
depression, anxiety, or a sleeping disorder;
(S) Preterm delivery in subsequent pregnancies;
(T) Renal failure;
(U) Respiratory arrest;
(V) Shock;
(W) Uterine perforation; and
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(X) Other adverse event;
(5) “Conception” means the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a
human ovum;
(6) “Emancipated minor” means a person under eighteen (18) years
of age who is or has been married or who has been legally emancipated;
(7) “Facility” means a public or private hospital, clinic,
center, medical school, medical training institution, healthcare facility,
physician's office, infirmary, dispensary, ambulatory surgical treatment
center, or other institution or location where medical care is provided to a
person;
(8) “First trimester” means the first twelve (12) weeks of
gestation;
(9) “Gestational age” means the time that has elapsed since the
first day of the woman's last menstrual period;
(10) “Hospital” means any institution licensed as a hospital
pursuant to the laws of this state;
(11) “Medical emergency” means that condition which, on the basis
of the physician's good-faith clinical judgment, complicates the medical
condition of a pregnant woman and necessitates the immediate termination of
her pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will create serious
risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function;
(12) “Physician” means any person licensed to practice medicine
in this state, including medical doctors and doctors of osteopathy;
(13) “Pregnant” or “pregnancy” means that female reproductive
condition of having an unborn child in the woman's uterus;
(14) “Qualified person” means an agent of the physician who is a
psychologist, licensed social worker, licensed professional counselor,
registered nurse, physician assistant, or physician;
(15) “Unborn child” means the offspring of human beings from
conception until birth; and
(16) “Viability” means the state of fetal development when, in
the judgment of the physician based on the particular facts of the case
before him or her and in light of the most advanced medical technology and
information available to him or her, there is a reasonable likelihood of
sustained survival of the unborn child outside the body of his or her mother,
with or without artificial support.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011

20-16-1703. Informed consent requirement.
(a) A person shall not perform or induce an abortion without the
voluntary and informed consent of the woman upon whom the abortion is to be
performed or induced.
(b) Except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to an abortion
is voluntary and informed only if:
(1) At least seventy-two (72) hours before the abortion, the
physician who is to perform the abortion or the referring physician has
informed the woman, orally and in person, of the following:
(A) The name of the physician who will perform the
abortion;
(B) Medically accurate information that a reasonable
patient would consider material to the decision concerning whether or not to
undergo the abortion, including:
(i) A description of the proposed abortion method;
(ii) The immediate and long-term medical risks
associated with the proposed abortion method, including without limitation
the risks of:
(a) Cervical or uterine perforation;
(b) Danger to subsequent pregnancies;
(c) Hemorrhage; and
(d) Infection; and
(iii) Alternatives to the abortion;
(C) The probable gestational age of the unborn child at
the time the abortion is to be performed;
(D) The probable anatomical and physiological
characteristics of the unborn child at the time the abortion is to be
performed;
(E) The medical risks associated with carrying the unborn
child to term;
(F) Any need for anti-Rh immune globulin therapy if the
woman is Rh negative, the likely consequences of refusing such therapy, and
the cost of the therapy; and
(G) Information on reversing the effects of abortion-
inducing drugs;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(2) At least seventy-two (72) hours before the abortion, the
physician who is to perform the abortion, the referring physician, or a
qualified person informs the woman, orally and in person, that:
(A) Medical assistance benefits may be available for
prenatal care, childbirth, and neonatal care and that more detailed
information on the availability of such assistance is contained in the
printed materials and informational DVD given to her under § 20-16-1704;
(B) The printed materials and informational DVD under §
20-16-1704 describe the unborn child and list agencies that offer
alternatives to abortion;
(C)(i) The father of the unborn child is liable to assist
in the support of the child, even in instances in which he has offered to pay
for the abortion.
(ii) In a case of rape or incest, the information
required under subdivision (b)(2)(C)(i) of this section may be omitted;
(D) The woman is free to withhold or withdraw her consent
to the abortion at any time without affecting her right to future care or
treatment and without the loss of any state or federally funded benefits to
which she otherwise might be entitled;
(E) The information contained in the printed materials and
informational DVD given to her under § 20-16-1704 is also available on a
state website; and
(F) Human trafficking literature, also known as “Laura's
Card”, as described in § 16-90-1107;
(3)(A) The information required under subdivisions (b)(1) and
(2) of this section is provided to the woman individually and in a private
room to protect her privacy, to maintain the confidentiality of her decision,
to ensure that the information focuses on her individual circumstances, and
to ensure that she has an adequate opportunity to ask questions.
(B) Subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section does not
preclude the provision of required information through a translator in a
language understood by the woman;
(4)(A) At least seventy-two (72) hours before the abortion, the
woman is given a copy of the printed materials and permitted to view and
given a copy of the informational DVD under § 20-16-1704.
(B) If the woman is unable to read the materials, the
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
materials shall be read to her in a language she can understand.
(C) If the woman asks questions concerning any of the
information or materials under this subdivision (b)(4), the person who
provides or reads the information or materials shall answer her questions in
a language she can understand;
(5)(A) At least seventy-two (72) hours before an abortion is
performed or induced on a woman whose pregnancy has progressed to twenty (20)
weeks' gestation or more, the physician performing the abortion on the
pregnant woman, the referring physician, or a qualified person assisting the
physician, orally and in person, offers information on fetal pain to the
patient.
(B) The information required under subdivision (b)(5)(A)
of this section and counseling related to that information shall include
without limitation the following:
(i) That by twenty (20) weeks' gestational age, the
unborn child possesses all anatomical links in its nervous system, including
spinal cord, nerve tracts, thalamus, and cortex, that are necessary in order
to feel pain;
(ii) That an unborn child at twenty (20) weeks'
gestation or more is fully capable of experiencing pain;
(iii) A description of the actual steps in the
abortion procedure to be performed or induced and at which steps in the
abortion procedure the unborn child is capable of feeling pain;
(iv) That maternal anesthesia typically offers little
pain prevention for the unborn child; and
(v) That an anesthetic or analgesic, or both, are
available so that pain to the fetus is minimized or alleviated;
(6)(A) Before the abortion, the pregnant woman certifies in
writing on a checklist form provided or approved by the Department of Health
that the information required under § 20-16-1704 has been provided.
(B) A physician who performs an abortion shall report
monthly to the department the total number of certifications the physician
has received.
(C) The department shall make available to the public
annually the number of certifications received under subdivision (b)(6)(B) of
this section;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(7)(A) Except in the case of a medical emergency, the physician
who is to perform the abortion receives and signs a copy of the written
certification required under subdivision (b)(6)(A) of this section before
performing the abortion.
(B) The physician shall retain a copy of the checklist
certification form in the pregnant woman's medical record;
(8) At least seventy-two (72) hours before an abortion that is
being performed or induced utilizing abortion-inducing drugs, the physician
who is to perform the abortion, the referring physician, or a qualified
person informs the pregnant woman, orally and in person, that:
(A) It may be possible to reverse the effects of the
abortion if the pregnant woman changes her mind, but that time is of the
essence; and
(B) Information on reversing the effects of abortion-
inducing drugs is available in materials prepared by the department;
(9)(A) After dispensing the first dose of abortion-inducing drugs to a
woman, the physician who is to perform the abortion, the referring physician,
or a qualified person shall provide a written notice to the patient that
states:
“Notice to Patients Having Medication Abortions That Use
Mifepristone: Mifepristone, also known as ‘RU-486’ or ‘Mifeprex’, alone is
not always effective in ending a pregnancy. It may be possible to reverse its
intended effect if the second pill or tablet has not been taken or
administered. If you change your mind and wish to try to continue the
pregnancy, you can locate immediate help by searching the term ‘abortion pill
reversal’ on the internet.”
(B) The notice shall also include directions to access the
department website that is required to be maintained under § 20-16-1704 and
other appropriate telephone and internet resources; and
(10) Except in the case of a medical emergency, at least seventy-two
(72) hours before the abortion, the pregnant woman signs a form that includes
without limitation the following information:
(A) A description of the pregnant woman's rights, including the
right to informed consent as granted by this subchapter;
(B) A detailed description of the surgical procedures or medical
procedures, or both, that are planned to be performed on the pregnant woman;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(C) A detailed list of the risks and hazards related to the
surgical or medical procedures that are planned to be for the pregnant woman,
including without limitation the following risks and hazards that may occur:
(i) Infection;
(ii) Blood clots;
(iii) Hemorrhage;
(iv) Allergic reactions;
(v) Uterine perforation, also known as a hole in the
uterus, or other damage to the uterus;
(vi) Sterility;
(vii) Injury to the bowel or bladder;
(viii) Possible hysterectomy as a result of complication or
injury during the procedure;
(ix) Failure to remove all products of conception;
(x) Possible continuation of pregnancy;
(xi) Cramping of the uterus or pelvic pain;
(xii) Cervical laceration;
(xiii) Incompetent cervix;
(xiv) Emergency treatment for any complications; and
(xv) Death;
(D) A description of additional information that shall be
provided by the physician to the pregnant woman under state law; and
(E) Any additional information that may be provided to a woman
under the laws of this state in order for a physician to obtain her informed
consent before performing an abortion.
(c)(1) In the event of a medical emergency requiring an immediate
termination of pregnancy, the physician who performed the abortion clearly
certifies in writing the nature of the medical emergency and the
circumstances that necessitated the waiving of the informed consent
requirements under this subchapter.
(2) The certification required under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be signed by the physician who performed the emergency abortion
and shall be permanently filed in both the records of the physician
performing the abortion and the records of the facility where the abortion
took place.
(d) A physician, facility, employee or volunteer of a facility, or any
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
other person or entity shall not require or obtain payment for a service
provided in relation to abortion to a patient who has inquired about an
abortion or scheduled an abortion until the expiration of the seventy-two-
hour reflection period required in this section.
(e) All ultrasound images, test results, and forms signed by the
patient or legal guardian shall be retained as a part of the patient's
medical record and be made available for inspection by the department or
other authorized agency.

20-16-1704. Publication of materials.
(a)(1) The Department of Health shall:
(A) Publish easily comprehensible printed materials and an
informational DVD in English and Spanish within ninety (90) days after July
22, 2015;
(B) Develop and maintain a secure internet website, which
may be part of an existing website, to provide the information required under
this subchapter; and
(C) Monitor the website on a weekly basis to prevent and
correct tampering.
(2) The department shall not collect or maintain information
regarding persons using the website.
(b) The department shall review and update annually, if necessary, the
following printed materials and informational DVD, which shall be easily
comprehensible:
(1)(A) Geographically indexed materials that inform a pregnant
woman seeking an abortion of public and private agencies and services
available to assist her through pregnancy, upon childbirth, and while her
child is dependent, including without limitation adoption agencies.
(B) The materials shall:
(i) Include:
(a) A comprehensive list of the public and
private agencies and services, a description of the services they offer, and
the telephone numbers and addresses of the agencies; and
(b) The following statement: “There are many
public and private agencies willing and able to help you to carry your child
to term and to assist you and your child after your child is born, whether
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
you choose to keep your child or to place her or him for adoption. The State
of Arkansas strongly urges you to contact one or more of these agencies
before making a final decision about abortion. The law requires that your
physician or his or her agent give you the opportunity to call agencies like
these before you undergo an abortion.”;
(ii) Inform the pregnant woman about available
medical assistance benefits for prenatal care, childbirth, and neonatal care;
(iii) Contain a toll-free, twenty-four-hour telephone
number that may be called to obtain information about the agencies in the
geographic area of the caller and of the services offered; and
(iv) State that:
(a) It is unlawful for any individual to
coerce a woman to undergo an abortion;
(b) If a minor is denied financial support by
the minor's parents, guardian, or custodian due to the minor's refusal to
undergo an abortion, the minor shall be deemed emancipated for the purposes
of eligibility for public assistance benefits, except that benefits may not
be used to obtain an abortion;
(c) A physician who performs an abortion upon
a woman without her informed consent may be liable to her for damages in a
civil action; and
(d) The law permits adoptive parents to pay
costs of prenatal care, childbirth, and neonatal care.
(C) The department shall ensure that the materials
described in this section are comprehensive and do not directly or indirectly
promote, exclude, or discourage the use of any public or private agency or
service described in this section;
(2)(A) Materials that include information on the support
obligations of a father of a child who is born alive, including without
limitation the father's legal duty to support the child, including child
support payments and health insurance, and the fact that paternity may be
established by the father's signature on a birth certificate, by a statement
of paternity, or by court action.
(B) The materials shall state that more information
concerning establishment of paternity and child support services and
enforcement may be obtained by calling state or county public assistance
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
agencies;
(3)(A) Materials that describe the probable anatomical and
physiological characteristics of the unborn child at two-week gestational
increments from fertilization to full term, including color photographs of
the unborn child at two-week gestational increments.
(B) The materials and descriptions shall:
(i)(a) Include information about brain and heart
functions, the presence of external features and internal organs during the
applicable stages of development, and any relevant information on the
possibility of the unborn child's survival.
(b) If a photograph is not available, a
picture shall contain the dimensions of the unborn child and shall be
realistic; and
(ii) Be objective, nonjudgmental, and designed to
convey only accurate scientific information about the unborn child at the
various gestational ages;
(4) Materials that contain objective information describing the
various surgical and drug-induced methods of abortion, as well as the
immediate and long-term medical risks commonly associated with each abortion
method, including without limitation the risks of:
(A) Cervical or uterine perforation or rupture;
(B) Danger to subsequent pregnancies;
(C) Hemorrhage;
(D) Infection;
(E) Medical risks associated with carrying a child to term
following an abortion; and
(F) Possible adverse psychological effects associated with
an abortion;
(5) A uniform resource locator for the state website where the
materials required under this section can be found;
(6)(A) Materials that include information on the potential
ability of a qualified person to reverse the effects of abortion-inducing
drugs, such as mifepristone, Mifeprex, and misoprostol, including without
limitation information directing a woman to obtain further information at
appropriate websites and by contacting appropriate agencies for assistance in
locating a healthcare professional to aid in the reversal of an abortion.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(B) The materials shall include a notice to the patient
that states:
“Notice to Patients Having Medication Abortions That Use
Mifepristone: Mifepristone, also known as ‘RU-486’ or ‘Mifeprex’, alone is
not always effective in ending a pregnancy. It may be possible to reverse its
intended effect if the second pill or tablet has not been taken or
administered. If you change your mind and wish to try to continue the
pregnancy, you can locate immediate help by searching the term ‘abortion pill
reversal’ on the internet.”
(C) The notice shall also include directions to access the
department website and other appropriate telephone and internet resources;
and
(7) A checklist certification form to be used by the physician
or a qualified person assisting the physician that lists the items of
information to be given to the woman by a physician or the agent under this
subchapter.
(c) The materials shall be printed in a typeface large enough to be
clearly legible.
(d)(1) The department shall produce a standard format DVD that may be
used statewide presenting the information required under this section.
(2) In preparing the DVD, the department may summarize and make
reference to the comprehensive printed list of geographically indexed names
and services described in this section.
(3)(A) The DVD shall show, in addition to the information
described in this section, an ultrasound of the heartbeat of an unborn child
at four to five (4-5) weeks' gestational age, at six to eight (6-8) weeks'
gestational age, and each month thereafter, until viability.
(B) The information in the DVD shall be presented in an
objective, unbiased manner designed to convey only accurate scientific
information.
(e) The materials and the DVD required under this section shall be
available at no cost from the department upon request and in appropriate
number to any person, facility, or hospital.

20-16-1705. Prevention of forced abortion — Signage in abortion
facilities.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(a)(1) A licensed facility where abortions are performed shall post a
sign conspicuously in a location defined in subsection (b) of this section
that is clearly visible to all individuals who enter and that features the
text contained in subdivision (a)(2) of this section.
(2) The sign shall display the following text:
“It is against the law for anyone, regardless of his or her
relationship to you, to force you to have an abortion. You have the right to
contact any local or state law enforcement or any social service agency to
receive protection from any actual or threatened physical, emotional, or
psychological abuse. It is against the law to perform, induce, prescribe for,
or provide you with the means for an abortion without your voluntary
consent.”
(b) The sign shall be posted in each waiting room, patient
consultation room, and procedure room used by patients for whom abortions are
performed, induced, prescribed or for whom the means for an abortion are
provided.
(c) The continued posting of signage shall be a condition of licensure
of any facility that performs or induces abortions.
(d) The display of signage does not discharge the duty of a facility
to have a physician orally inform a pregnant woman of information and
materials contained in § 20-16-1703.
(e)(1) The Department of Health shall provide all signs required by
this section to the licensed abortion facility.
(2) The department may require that a licensed abortion facility
reimburse the department for any costs associated with the sign or signs.

20-16-1706. Medical emergencies.
When a medical emergency compels the performance of an abortion, the
physician shall inform the woman before the abortion, if possible, of the
medical indications supporting the physician's judgment that an immediate
abortion is necessary to avert her death or that a seventy-two-hour delay
will cause substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily
function.

20-16-1707. Rules — Collection and reporting of information.
(a) The Department of Health shall develop and promulgate rules
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
regarding reporting requirements.
(b)(1) The Arkansas Center for Health Statistics shall ensure that all
information collected by the center regarding abortions performed in this
state shall be available to the public in printed form and on a twenty-four-
hour basis on the center's website.
(2) In no case shall the privacy of a patient or doctor be
compromised.
(c) The information collected by the center regarding abortions
performed in this state shall be continually updated.
(d)(1)(A) By June 3 of each year, the department shall issue a public
report providing statistics on the number of women who were provided
information and materials pursuant to this subchapter during the previous
calendar year.
(B) Each report shall also provide the statistics for all
previous calendar years, adjusted to reflect any additional information
received after the deadline.
(2) The department shall take care to ensure that none of the
information included in the public reports could reasonably lead to the
identification of any individual who received information or materials in
accordance with § 20-16-1703.

20-16-1708. Rules.
(a)(1) The Department of Health shall adopt rules to implement this
subchapter.
(2) The department may add by rule additional examples of
complications to supplement those in § 20-16-1703.
(b) The Arkansas State Medical Board shall promulgate rules to ensure
that physicians who perform abortions, referring physicians, or agents of
either physician comply with all the requirements of this subchapter.

20-16-1709. Criminal penalty.
A person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly violates this
subchapter commits a Class A misdemeanor.

20-16-1710. Civil penalties.
(a) In addition to any remedies available under the common law or
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
statutory law of this state, failure to comply with the requirements of this
subchapter shall provide a basis for a:
(1) Civil malpractice action for actual and punitive damages;
and
(2) Professional disciplinary action under the Arkansas Medical
Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et
seq.
(b) A civil liability shall not be assessed against the woman upon
whom the abortion is performed.
(c) When requested, the court shall allow a woman to proceed using
solely her initials or a pseudonym and may close the proceedings in the case
and enter other protective orders to preserve the privacy of the woman upon
whom the abortion was performed or attempted.
(d) If judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff, the court shall
also render judgment for a reasonable attorney's fee in favor of the
plaintiff against the defendant.
(e) If judgment is rendered in favor of the defendant and the court
finds that the plaintiff's suit was frivolous and brought in bad faith, the
court shall also render judgment for a reasonable attorney's fee in favor of
the defendant against the plaintiff.

20-16-1711. Construction.
(a) This subchapter does not create or recognize a right to abortion.
(b) This subchapter is not intended to make lawful an abortion that is
currently unlawful.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 18, is
repealed.
Subchapter 18 — Arkansas Unborn Child Protection from Dismemberment Abortion
Act

20-16-1801. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Unborn
Child Protection from Dismemberment Abortion Act”.

20-16-1802. Definitions.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Abortion” means the use or prescription of any instrument,
medicine, drug, or any other substance or device:
(A) To terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be
pregnant with an intention other than to:
(i) Increase the probability of a live birth;
(ii) Preserve the life or health of the child after
live birth; or
(iii) Remove a dead unborn child who died in utero as
the result of natural causes, accidental trauma, or a criminal assault on the
pregnant woman or her unborn child; and
(B) Which causes the premature termination of the
pregnancy;
(2) “Attempt to perform or induce an abortion” means an act or
an omission of a statutorily required act, that under the circumstances as
the actor believes them to be, constitutes a substantial step in a course of
conduct planned to culminate in the performance or induction of an abortion
in this state in violation of this subchapter;
(3)(A)(i) “Dismemberment abortion” means an abortion performed
with the purpose of causing the death of an unborn child that purposely
dismembers the living unborn child and extracts one (1) piece at a time from
the uterus through the use of clamps, grasping forceps, tongs, scissors, or
similar instruments that, through the convergence of two (2) rigid levers,
slice, crush, or grasp a portion of the body of the unborn child to cut or
tear off a portion of the body of the unborn child.
(ii) “Dismemberment abortion” includes an abortion in
which suction is used to extract the body of the unborn child subsequent to
the dismemberment of the unborn child as described under subdivision
(3)(A)(i) of this section.
(B) “Dismemberment abortion” does not include an abortion
that uses suction to dismember the body parts of the unborn child into a
collection container;
(4) “Physician” means any person licensed to practice medicine
in this state, including a medical doctor or a doctor of osteopathy;
(5) “Purposely” means to act with purpose with respect to a
material element of an offense when:
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(A) If the element involves the nature of the conduct of
the actor or a result of the conduct of the actor, it is the conscious object
of the actor to engage in conduct of that nature or cause such a result; and
(B) If the element involves the attendant circumstances,
the actor is aware of the existence of such circumstances or the actor
believes or hopes that such circumstances exist;
(6)(A) “Serious health risk to the pregnant woman” means a
condition that, in a reasonable medical judgment, complicates the medical
condition of a pregnant woman to such an extent that the abortion of a
pregnancy is necessary to avert either the death of the pregnant woman or the
serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major
bodily function of the pregnant woman.
(B) “Serious health risk to the pregnant woman” does not
include:
(i) A psychological or emotional condition; or
(ii) A medical diagnosis that is based on a claim of
the pregnant woman or on a presumption that the pregnant woman will engage in
conduct that could result in her death or that could cause substantial and
irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant
woman;
(7) “Unborn child” means an individual organism of the species
Homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth; and
(8) “Woman” means a female human being whether or not she has
reached the age of majority.

20-16-1803. Ban on dismemberment abortion.
(a) A person shall not purposely perform or attempt to perform a
dismemberment abortion and thereby kill an unborn child unless it is
necessary to prevent a serious health risk to the pregnant woman.
(b)(1) A person who is accused of violating subsection (a) of this
section may seek a hearing before the Arkansas State Medical Board regarding
whether the dismemberment abortion was necessary to prevent a serious health
risk to the pregnant woman.
(2) The findings of the board are admissible in any court
proceedings under this subchapter.
(3) Upon a motion by the person who is accused of violating
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
subsection (a) of this section, a court shall delay the beginning of a trial
for no more than thirty (30) days to permit a hearing under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section.
(c) The following individuals are excluded from liability under this
subchapter:
(1) A woman who receives or attempts to receive a dismemberment
abortion;
(2) A nurse, technician, secretary, receptionist, or other
employee or agent who is not a physician but acts at the direction of a
physician; and
(3) A pharmacist or other individual who is not a physician but
who fills a prescription or provides instruments or materials used in a
dismemberment abortion to the physician or at the direction of the physician.
(d)(1) This subchapter does not prohibit an abortion by any other
method for any reason, including rape or incest when documentation is
presented that states that the crime has been reported to law enforcement.
(2) The physician or abortion facility shall:
(A) File the documentation that a crime has been reported
to law enforcement in the pregnant woman's medical record; and
(B) Report to the Department of Health the number of
abortions performed because of rape or incest.

20-16-1804. Civil remedies — Attorney's fees.
(a)(1) A cause of action for injunctive relief against a person who
has purposely violated this subchapter may be maintained by:
(A) The woman who receives or attempted to receive a
dismemberment abortion in violation of this subchapter;
(B) A person who is the spouse, parent, or legal guardian
of the woman who receives or attempted to receive a dismemberment abortion in
violation of this subchapter; or
(C) A current or former licensed healthcare provider of
the woman who receives or attempted to receive a dismemberment abortion in
violation of this subchapter.
(2) The injunction shall prevent the abortion provider from
performing or attempting to perform further dismemberment abortions in
violation of this subchapter.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(b)(1) A cause of action for civil damages against a person who has
purposely violated this subchapter may be maintained by:
(A) The woman who receives a dismemberment abortion in
violation of this subchapter;
(B) The father of the unborn child, if the father is
married to the woman at the time the dismemberment abortion was performed in
violation of this subchapter; or
(C) If the woman who received a dismemberment abortion in
violation of this subchapter is a minor or has died as a result of the
dismemberment abortion, the parents or legal guardians of the woman who
received a dismemberment abortion in violation of this subchapter.
(2) Civil damages shall not be awarded to a plaintiff if the
pregnancy resulted from the criminal conduct of the plaintiff.
(3) Civil damages shall include:
(A) Monetary damages for psychological injuries and
physical injuries associated with the dismemberment abortion; and
(B) Statutory damages equal to three (3) times the cost of
the dismemberment abortion.
(c)(1) If judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff, the court
shall also render judgment for a reasonable attorney's fee in favor of the
plaintiff against the defendant.
(2) If judgment is rendered in favor of the defendant and the
court finds that the plaintiff's suit was frivolous and brought in bad faith,
the court shall also render judgment for a reasonable attorney's fee in favor
of the defendant against the plaintiff.
(3) A reasonable attorney's fee shall not be assessed against
the woman who received a dismemberment abortion.

20-16-1805. Criminal penalty.
A person who violates § 20-16-1803(a) commits a Class D felony.

20-16-1806. Protection of privacy in court proceedings.
(a) In a civil proceeding or action brought under this subchapter, the
court shall determine whether the anonymity of a woman who received or
attempted to receive a dismemberment abortion shall be preserved from public
disclosure without her written consent.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(b)(1) Upon determining that the anonymity of a woman who received or
attempted to receive a dismemberment abortion shall be preserved, the court
shall issue an order to the parties, witnesses, and counsel and shall direct
the sealing of the record and exclusion of individuals from courtrooms or
hearing rooms to the extent necessary to safeguard from public disclosure the
identity of the woman who received or attempted to receive a dismemberment
abortion.
(2) An order under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be
accompanied by specific written findings explaining:
(A) Why the anonymity of the woman who received or
attempted to receive a dismemberment abortion should be preserved from public
disclosure;
(B) Why the order is essential to that end;
(C) How the order is narrowly tailored to serve that end;
and
(D) Why no reasonable, less restrictive alternative
exists.
(3) In the absence of written consent of the woman who received
or attempted to receive a dismemberment abortion, anyone other than a public
official who brings an action under § 20-16-1804 shall bring the action under
a pseudonym.
(4) This subsection does not conceal from the defendant the
identity of the plaintiff or of a witness.

20-16-1807. Construction.
This subchapter does not:
(1) Create or recognize a right to abortion;
(2) Create or recognize a right to a particular method of
abortion; or
(3) Make lawful an abortion that is currently unlawful under any
law of this state.

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 19, is
repealed.
Subchapter 19 — Sex Discrimination by Abortion Prohibition Act

01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
20-16-1901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Sex
Discrimination by Abortion Prohibition Act”.

20-16-1902. Legislative findings and purpose.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) With regard to sex-selection abortion:
(A) The victims of sex-selection abortion are
overwhelmingly female;
(B) A sex-selection abortion is used to prevent the birth
of a child of an undesired sex;
(C) The United States, along with other countries, has
petitioned the United Nations General Assembly to declare sex-selection
abortion a crime against women;
(D) Countries such as India, Great Britain, and China have
taken steps to end sex-selection abortions;
(E) Women are a vital part of our society and culture and
possess the same fundamental human rights as men;
(F) The United States prohibits discrimination on the
basis of sex in various areas, including employment, education, athletics,
and health insurance;
(G) It is undesirable to have a distortion in the sex
ratio within a society, particularly when there is a shortage of women; and
(H) Countries with high rates of male preference have
experienced ill effects as a result of having an increasing population of
young, unmarried men; and
(2) With regard to maternal health:
(A) It is undisputed that abortion risks to maternal
health increase as gestation increases;
(B) The risk of death for pregnant women at eight (8)
weeks' gestation is one (1) death per one million (1,000,000) and rises to:
(i) One (1) death per twenty-nine thousand (29,000)
abortions between sixteen (16) and twenty (20) weeks' gestation; and
(ii) One (1) death per eleven thousand (11,000)
abortions at twenty-one (21) weeks' gestation or later;
(C) A woman is thirty-five (35) times more likely to die
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
from an abortion performed at twenty (20) weeks' gestation than she would
have been had the abortion been performed in the first trimester;
(D) A woman is ninety-one (91) times more likely to die
from an abortion performed at twenty-one (21) weeks' gestation or later than
she would have been had the abortion been performed in the first trimester;
and
(E) Because abortions performed solely based on the sex of
a child are generally performed later in pregnancy, women undergoing these
abortions are unnecessarily exposed to increased health risks, including an
exponentially higher risk of death.
(b) Based on the findings in this section, the purpose of this
subchapter is to:
(1) Ban abortions performed solely for reasons of sex-selection;
and
(2) Protect women from the risks inherent in late-term
abortions.

20-16-1903. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing any
instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman, with
knowledge that the termination by any of those means will with reasonable
likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the intent to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Incompetent” means an individual who has been adjudicated
as an individual with a disability and has had a guardian appointed for her;
(3) “Minor” means an individual under eighteen (18) years of
age;
(4) “Physician” means a person licensed to practice medicine in
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
this state, including a medical doctor and a doctor of osteopathy;
(5) “Sex-selection abortion” means an abortion performed solely
on the basis of the sex of the unborn child;
(6) “Unborn child” means the offspring of human beings from
conception until birth; and
(7) “Viability” means the state of fetal development when, in
the judgment of the physician based on the particular facts of the case
before him or her and in light of the most advanced medical technology and
information available to him or her, there is a reasonable likelihood of
sustained survival of the unborn child outside the body of the mother, with
or without artificial life support.

20-16-1904. Prohibition — Sex-selection abortion.
(a) A physician or other person shall not intentionally perform or
attempt to perform an abortion with the knowledge that the pregnant woman is
seeking the abortion solely on the basis of the sex of the unborn child.
(b) Before performing an abortion, the physician or other person who
is performing the abortion shall:
(1)(A) Ask the pregnant woman if she knows the sex of the unborn
child.
(B) If the pregnant woman knows the sex of the unborn
child, the physician or other person who is performing the abortion shall
inform the pregnant woman of the prohibition of abortion as a method of sex
selection for children; and
(2)(A) Request the medical records of the pregnant woman
relating directly to the entire pregnancy history of the woman.
(B) An abortion shall not be performed until reasonable
time and effort is spent to obtain the medical records of the pregnant woman
as described in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.
(c) If this section is held invalid as applied to the period of
pregnancy prior to viability, then the section shall remain applicable to the
period of pregnancy subsequent to viability.

20-16-1905. Criminal penalties.
A physician or other person who knowingly performs or attempts to
perform an abortion prohibited by this subchapter is guilty of a Class A
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
misdemeanor.

20-16-1906. Civil penalties and professional sanctions.
(a)(1) A physician or other person who knowingly violates this
subchapter is liable for damages and shall have his or her medical license
suspended or revoked as applicable.
(2) The physician or other person may also be enjoined from
future acts prohibited by this subchapter.
(b)(1) A woman who receives an abortion in violation of this
subchapter without being informed of the prohibition of abortion as a method
of sex selection for children, the parent or legal guardian of the woman if
the woman is a minor who is not emancipated, or the legal guardian of the
woman if the woman has been adjudicated incompetent, may commence a civil
action for any reckless violation of this subchapter and may seek both actual
and punitive damages.
(2) Damages may include without limitation:
(A) Money damages for all psychological and physical
injuries occasioned by the violation of this subchapter; and
(B) Statutory damages equal to ten (10) times the cost of
the abortion performed in violation of this subchapter.
(c) A physician or other person who performs an abortion in violation
of this subchapter shall be considered to have engaged in unprofessional
conduct for which his or her license to provide healthcare services in this
state shall be suspended or revoked by the Arkansas State Medical Board.
(d)(1) A cause of action for injunctive relief against any physician
or other person who has knowingly violated this subchapter may be maintained
by:
(A) A person who is the spouse, parent, guardian, or
current or former licensed healthcare provider of the woman who receives or
attempts to receive an abortion in violation of this subchapter; or
(B) The Attorney General.
(2) The injunction shall prevent the physician or other person
from performing further abortions in violation of this subchapter.

20-16-1907. Exclusion of liability for a woman who undergoes
prohibited abortion.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(a) A woman who receives or attempts to receive an abortion in
violation of this subchapter shall not be prosecuted under this subchapter
for conspiracy to violate this subchapter or otherwise be held criminally or
civilly liable for any violation.
(b) In a criminal proceeding or action brought under this subchapter,
a woman who receives or attempts to receive an abortion in violation of this
subchapter is entitled to all rights, protections, and notifications afforded
to crime victims.
(c)(1) In a civil proceeding or action brought under this subchapter,
the anonymity of the woman who receives or attempts to receive the abortion
in violation of this subchapter shall be preserved from public disclosure
unless she gives her consent to disclosure.
(2) A court of competent jurisdiction, upon motion or sua
sponte, shall issue orders to the parties, witnesses, and counsel and direct
the sealing of the record and exclusion of the individuals from the courtroom
or hearing room to the extent necessary to safeguard the identity of the
woman from public disclosure.
(3) In the absence of written consent of the woman who receives
or attempts to receive an abortion in violation of this subchapter, a person
who initiates a proceeding or action under § 20-16-1906(b) or § 20-16-1906(d)
shall do so under a pseudonym.

20-16-1908. Construction.
(a) This subchapter shall not be construed as creating or recognizing
a right to abortion.
(b) It is not the intention of this subchapter to make lawful an
abortion that is currently unlawful.

20-16-1909. Right of intervention.
The General Assembly by joint resolution may appoint one (1) or more of
its members who sponsored or cosponsored this subchapter in his or her
official capacity to intervene as a matter of right in any case in which the
constitutionality of this law is challenged.

20-16-1910. Effective date.
This subchapter takes effect on January 1, 2018.
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 20, is
repealed.
Subchapter 20 — Cherish Act

20-16-2001. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Cherish Act”.

20-16-2002. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1)(A) The United States is one (1) of only seven (7) nations in
the world that permits nontherapeutic or elective abortion on request after
the twentieth week of gestation.
(B) Fully seventy-five percent (75%) of all nations do not
permit abortion after twelve (12) weeks' gestation, except to save the life
and preserve the physical health of the mother;
(2) Medical and other authorities now know more about human
prenatal development than ever before, including without limitation:
(A) Between five (5) and six (6) weeks' gestation, an
unborn human being's heart begins to beat;
(B) An unborn human being begins to move about in the womb
at approximately eight (8) weeks' gestation;
(C) At nine (9) weeks' gestation, all basic physiological
functions, buds for teeth, eyes, and external genitalia are present;
(D)(i) An unborn human being's vital organs begin to
function at ten (10) weeks' gestation.
(ii) Hair, fingernails, and toenails begin to form at
ten (10) weeks' gestation;
(E)(i) At eleven (11) weeks' gestation, an unborn human
being's diaphragm develops, which can result in hiccups.
(ii) In addition, an unborn human being begins to
move about freely in the womb; and
(F)(i) At twelve (12) weeks' gestation, an unborn human
being can open and close his or her fingers, make sucking motions, and sense
stimulation from outside the womb.
(ii) At this stage, the unborn human being takes on
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
“the human form” in all relevant aspects as stated in Gonzales v. Carhart,
550 U.S. 124, 160 (2007);
(3) The United States Supreme Court has recognized that a state
has an “important and legitimate interest in protecting the potentiality of
human life” in Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113, 162 (1973), and, specifically, that
“the state has an interest in protecting the life of the unborn” as discussed
in Planned Parenthood of Southeastern Pennsylvania v. Casey, 505 U.S. 833,
873 (1992);
(4)(A) The majority of abortion procedures performed after
fifteen (15) weeks' gestation are dismemberment abortions as defined by § 20-
16-1802, which are prohibited under the Arkansas Unborn Child Protection from
Dismemberment Abortion Act, § 20-16-1801 et seq.
(B) The performance of these types of abortions for
nontherapeutic or elective reasons is a barbaric practice that is dangerous
for the pregnant woman and demeaning to the medical profession;
(5) Most obstetricians and gynecologists practicing in this
state do not offer or perform nontherapeutic or elective abortions;
(6)(A) According to a 2004 article, abortion can cause
significant physical and psychological risks to the pregnant woman that
increase with gestational age.
(B) Specifically, the relative physical and psychological
risks escalate exponentially as gestational age increases in abortions
performed after eight (8) weeks' gestation;
(7) In the vast majority of uncomplicated pregnancies, the
maternal health risks of undergoing an abortion become greater than the risks
of carrying a pregnancy to term as the second trimester progresses;
(8) In abortions performed after fifteen (15) weeks' gestation,
there is a higher risk that a pregnant woman will require a hysterectomy,
other reparative surgery, or blood transfusions; and
(9) The state has “legitimate interests from the outset of
pregnancy in protecting the health of women” as determined by Planned
Parenthood of Southeastern Pennsylvania v. Casey, 505 U.S. 833, 847 (1992),
as the “medical, emotional, and psychological consequences of abortion are
serious and can be lasting” as stated in H.L. v. Matheson, 450 U.S. 398, 411
(1981).
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to restrict the practice
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
of nontherapeutic or elective abortions to the period up to the eighteenth
week of gestation.

20-16-2003. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing any
instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman, with
knowledge that the termination by any of those means will with reasonable
likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the intent to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Attempt to perform or induce an abortion” means an act or
an omission of a statutorily required act that, under the circumstances as
the actor believes them to be, constitutes a substantial step in a course of
conduct planned to culminate in the performance or induction of an abortion
in this state in violation of this subchapter;
(3) “Conception” means the fusion of human spermatozoon with a
human ovum;
(4) “Gestation” means the time that has elapsed since the first
day of the woman's last menstrual period;
(5) “Human being” means an individual member of the species Homo
sapiens from and after the point of conception;
(6) “Major bodily function” means the functions of the body,
including without limitation functions of the immune system, normal cell
growth, and digestive, bowel, bladder, neurological, brain, respiratory,
circulatory, endocrine, and reproductive functions;
(7) “Medical emergency” means a condition that, on the basis of
the physician's good-faith clinical judgment, necessitates an abortion to
preserve the life of a pregnant woman whose life is endangered by a physical
disorder, physical illness, or physical injury, including a life endangering
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
physical condition arising from the pregnancy itself, or when the
continuation of the pregnancy will create a serious risk of substantial and
irreversible impairment of a major bodily function;
(8) “Physician” means a person licensed to practice medicine in
this state, including a medical doctor; and
(9) “Probable gestational age” means the age of an unborn human
being as calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of the
pregnant woman.

20-16-2004. Abortion limited to 18 weeks' gestation.
(a) Except in a medical emergency or if the pregnancy results from a
rape under § 5-14-103 or incest under § 5-26-202 when documentation is
presented that states that the crime has been reported to law enforcement, a
person shall not perform, induce, or attempt to perform or induce an abortion
unless the physician or referring physician has:
(1) Made a determination of the probable gestational age of the
unborn human being according to standard medical practices and techniques
used in the medical community; and
(2) Documented the probable gestational age in the medical
records of the pregnant woman and, if required, in a report with the
Department of Health as described in subsection (c) of this section.
(b) Except in a medical emergency or if the pregnancy results from a
rape under § 5-14-103 or incest under § 5-26-202 when documentation is
presented that states that the crime has been reported to law enforcement, a
person shall not intentionally or knowingly perform, induce, or attempt to
perform or induce an abortion of an unborn human being if the probable
gestational age of the unborn human being is determined to be greater than
eighteen (18) weeks' gestation.
(c)(1) If a physician performs or induces an abortion on an unborn
human being whose gestational age is greater than eighteen (18) weeks, the
physician shall file a report with the department within fifteen (15) days of
the abortion.
(2) The report described in subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall contain:
(A) The date that the abortion was performed;
(B) The specific method used for the abortion;
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(C) The probable gestational age of the unborn human being
and the method used to calculate gestational age;
(D) A statement declaring that the abortion was
necessitated by a medical emergency;
(E) The specific medical indications supporting the
abortion and medical emergency;
(F) The probable health consequences of the abortion and
of the specific method used; and
(G) The signature of the physician attesting that the
information stated is true and correct to the best of his or her knowledge.
(3) A report made under this subsection shall not contain the
name of the pregnant woman upon whom the abortion was performed or any other
information or identifiers that would make it possible to identify, in any
manner or under any circumstances, a woman who obtained or sought to obtain
an abortion.
(d) The physician or abortion facility shall:
(1) File the documentation that a crime has been reported to law
enforcement in the pregnant woman's medical record; and
(2) Report to the department the number of abortions performed
because of rape or incest.

20-16-2005. Reporting forms.
(a) Within thirty (30) days of July 24, 2019, the Department of Health
shall create forms required by this subchapter.
(b) The reporting requirements shall be enforceable ten (10) days
after either July 24, 2019, or the date that the forms described in
subsection (a) of this section become available, whichever occurs later.

20-16-2006. Penalties — Additional enforcement.
(a)(1) A person who purposely or knowingly violates this subchapter is
guilty of a Class D felony.
(2) A woman upon whom an abortion is performed, induced, or
attempted in violation of this subchapter shall not be prosecuted for
conspiracy to commit a violation of this subchapter.
(b) A physician who purposely or knowingly violates this subchapter
commits an act of unprofessional conduct that shall result in the Arkansas
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
State Medical Board's suspending or revoking his or her license.
(c) A physician who purposely or knowingly delivers to the Department
of Health any report required under this subchapter that he or she knows is
false is subject to a civil penalty or fine up to two thousand dollars
($2,000) per violation imposed by the department.
(d) A woman upon whom an abortion has been performed, induced, or
attempted in violation of this subchapter may bring an action against the
person who purposely, knowingly, or recklessly performed, induced, or
attempted the abortion in violation of this subchapter for actual and
punitive damages.
(e)(1) A cause of action for injunctive relief against a person who
has purposely, knowingly, or recklessly violated this subchapter may be
maintained by:
(A) A prosecuting attorney with appropriate jurisdiction;
or
(B) The Attorney General.
(2) The injunction shall prevent the abortion provider from
performing or inducing and from attempting to perform or induce further
abortions in violation of this subchapter.
(f) If judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff in an action
described in this section, the court shall also render judgment for a
reasonable attorney's fee in favor of the plaintiff against the defendant.
(g) If judgment is rendered in favor of the defendant and the court
finds that the plaintiff's suit was frivolous and brought in bad faith, the
court shall render judgment for reasonable attorney's fees in favor of the
defendant against the plaintiff.
(h) Damages or attorney's fees shall not be assessed against the woman
upon whom an abortion was performed or induced or attempted to be performed
or induced except under subsection (d) of this section.

20-16-2007. Construction.
This subchapter does not:
(1) Create or recognize a right to abortion;
(2) Create or recognize a right to a particular method of
abortion; or
(3) Make lawful an abortion that is currently unlawful under any
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
law of this state.

20-16-2008. Right of intervention.
(a) The General Assembly by joint resolution may appoint one (1) or
more of its members who sponsored or cosponsored this subchapter in his or
her official capacity to intervene as a matter of right in any case in which
the constitutionality of this law is challenged.
(b) The Governor may also intervene as a matter of right in any case
in which the constitutionality of this law is challenged.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 21, is
repealed.
Subchapter 21 — Down Syndrome Discrimination by Abortion Prohibition Act

20-16-2101. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Down Syndrome
Discrimination by Abortion Prohibition Act”.

20-16-2102. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing any
instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman, with
knowledge that the termination by any of those means will with reasonable
likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the intent to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child or the pregnant woman;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Down Syndrome” means a chromosome disorder associated with
either:
(A) An extra copy of the chromosome 21, in whole or in
part; or
01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(B) An effective trisomy for chromosome 21;
(3) “Physician” means a person licensed to practice medicine in
this state, including a medical doctor and a doctor of osteopathy; and
(4) “Unborn child” means the offspring of human beings from
conception until birth.

20-16-2103. Prohibition — Down Syndrome.
(a) A physician shall not intentionally perform or attempt to perform
an abortion with the knowledge that a pregnant woman is seeking an abortion
solely on the basis of:
(1) A test result indicating Down Syndrome in an unborn child;
(2) A prenatal diagnosis of Down Syndrome in an unborn child; or
(3) Any other reason to believe that an unborn child has Down
Syndrome.
(b)(1) Before performing an abortion, the physician performing the
abortion shall ask the pregnant woman if she is aware of any test results,
prenatal diagnosis, or any other evidence that the unborn child may have Down
Syndrome.
(2) If the pregnant woman knows of any test results, prenatal
diagnosis, or any other evidence that the unborn child may have Down
Syndrome, the physician who is performing the abortion shall:
(A) Inform the pregnant woman of the prohibition of
abortion contained in subsection (a) of this section; and
(B) Request the medical records of the pregnant woman
relevant to determining whether she has previously aborted an unborn child or
children after she became aware of any test results, prenatal diagnosis, or
any other evidence that the unborn child may have had Down Syndrome.
(3) When the physician performing the abortion is required to
request the medical records of the pregnant women under subdivision (b)(2)(B)
of this section, the physician shall not perform an abortion until the
physician spends at least fourteen (14) days to obtain the medical records
described in subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section.
(c) If this section is held invalid as applied to the period of
pregnancy prior to viability, then this section shall remain applicable to
the period of pregnancy subsequent to viability.
(d) This section does not apply to an abortion performed on a pregnant
100 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
woman if the pregnancy is the result of rape or incest.

20-16-2104. Criminal penalties.
A physician or other person who knowingly performs or attempts to
perform an abortion prohibited by this subchapter is guilty of a Class D
felony.

20-16-2105. Civil penalties and professional sanctions.
(a)(1) A physician who knowingly violates this subchapter is liable
for damages and shall have his or her medical license revoked as applicable.
(2) The physician may also be enjoined from future acts
prohibited by this subchapter.
(b)(1) A woman who receives an abortion in violation of this
subchapter without being informed of the prohibition of abortion for the
purposes of aborting an unborn child diagnosed with Down Syndrome, the parent
or legal guardian of the woman if the woman is a minor who is not
emancipated, or the legal guardian of the woman if the woman has been
adjudicated incompetent, may commence a civil action for any reckless
violation of this subchapter and may seek both actual and punitive damages.
(2) Damages may include without limitation:
(A) Money damages for any psychological and physical
injuries occasioned by the violation of this subchapter; and
(B) Statutory damages equal to ten (10) times the cost of
the abortion performed in violation of this subchapter.
(c) A physician or other person who performs an abortion in violation
of this subchapter shall be considered to have engaged in unprofessional
conduct and his or her license to provide healthcare services in this state
shall be revoked by the Arkansas State Medical Board.
(d)(1) A cause of action for injunctive relief against any physician
or other person who has knowingly violated this subchapter may be maintained
by:
(A) A person who is the spouse, parent, guardian, or
current or former licensed healthcare provider of the woman who receives or
attempts to receive an abortion in violation of this subchapter; or
(B) The Attorney General.
(2) The injunction shall prevent the physician or other person
101 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
from performing further abortions in violation of this subchapter.

20-16-2106. Exclusion of liability for a woman who undergoes
prohibited abortion.
(a) A woman who receives or attempts to receive an abortion in
violation of this subchapter shall not be prosecuted under this subchapter
for conspiracy to violate this subchapter or otherwise be held criminally or
civilly liable for any violation of this subchapter.
(b) In a criminal proceeding or action brought under this subchapter,
a woman who receives or attempts to receive an abortion in violation of this
subchapter is entitled to all rights, protections, and notifications afforded
to crime victims.
(c)(1) In a civil proceeding or action brought under this subchapter,
the anonymity of the woman who receives or attempts to receive the abortion
in violation of this subchapter shall be preserved from public disclosure
unless she gives her consent to disclosure.
(2) A court of competent jurisdiction, upon motion or sua
sponte, shall issue orders to the parties, witnesses, and counsel and direct
the sealing of the record and exclusion of individuals from the courtroom or
hearing room to the extent necessary to safeguard the identity of the woman
from public disclosure.

20-16-2107. Right of intervention.
The General Assembly by joint resolution may appoint one (1) or more of
its members who sponsored or cosponsored this subchapter in his or her
official capacity to intervene as a matter of right in any case in which the
constitutionality of this law is challenged.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 22, is
repealed.
Subchapter 22 — Prohibition of Public Funding on Human Cloning and
Destructive Embry Research Act

20-16-2201. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Prohibition of
Public Funding of Human Cloning and Destructive Embryo Research Act”.
102 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011

20-16-2202. Legislative findings and purpose — Public policy.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The prospect of creating new human life solely to be
exploited or destroyed has been condemned on moral grounds as displaying a
profound disrespect for a human life;
(2) Destructive human embryo research reduces the status of
human embryos to a mere means for possible benefit for another person;
(3) The moral justification of medical or scientific research
cannot be based upon the dehumanizing and utilitarian premise that the ends
justify any means;
(4) Research and development of therapeutic cloning and methods
to ethically obtain adult stem cells have contributed valuable therapeutic
advancements and improved patient health and have proven more promising than
research involving the destruction or exploitation of human embryos as a
therapeutic means;
(5) Recent and promising advances in reprogramming human cells
to behave as if in an embryonic state render controversial cloned human
embryos unnecessary for use in destructive embryo research;
(6) Cloning embryos and destructive embryo research require
human egg cells which are very expensive to obtain;
(7) Harvesting human egg cells also creates significant health
risks to a woman, including without limitation:
(A) Ovarian hyperstimulation syndrome;
(B) Damage to internal organs or blood vessels;
(C) Infertility;
(D) Depression; and
(E) Death;
(8) Harvesting human egg cells for research contributes to the
commoditization and exploitation of women;
(9) Public opinion is divided over the deeply conflicting moral
and ethical concerns:
(A) Related to payments to women for access to human egg
cells; and
(B) Surrounding the creation and destruction of human
embryos; and
103 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(10) Providing public funding of destructive embryo research
would be a misuse of revenue collected by the state.
(b) Based on the findings in this section, the purpose of this
subchapter is to further the important and compelling state interest of:
(1) Respecting life and fostering a culture of life;
(2) Directing public expenditures:
(A) Away from funding research that has not yielded
significant scientific contributions or benefit to patients; and
(B) Toward funding research that has already made
significant contributions to patients; and
(3) Relieving the consciences of taxpayers who:
(A) Are concerned about the possible exploitation of women
that may result from payment for human egg cells; and
(B) Object to human cloning and destructive embryo
research.
(c) Public funding of human cloning and destructive embryo research,
including embryonic stem cell research, is against the public policy of this
state.

20-16-2203. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Destructive embryo research” means medical procedures,
scientific or laboratory research, or other types of investigation that kill
or injure the human embryo subject of the procedure or research.
(B) “Destructive embryo research” does not include:
(i) In vitro fertilization and accompanying embryo
transfer to the body of a woman;
(ii) Research in the use of nuclear transfer or other
cloning techniques to produce molecules, deoxyribonucleic acid, cells other
than human embryos, tissues, organs, plants, or animals other than humans; or
(iii) Any diagnostic procedure that benefits the
human embryo subject of the procedure or research while not imposing risks
greater than those considered acceptable for other human research subjects;
(2) “Embryo” means an organism of the species Homo sapiens from
the single cell stage to eight (8) weeks of development that is derived by
fertilization, parthenogenesis, human cloning, or any other means from one
104 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(1) or more human gametes or human diploid cells;
(3) “Embryonic stem cell” means a stem cell obtained from an
embryo of the species Homo sapiens;
(4) “Human cloning” means human asexual reproduction
accomplished by:
(A) Introducing the genetic material from one (1) or more
human somatic cells into a fertilized or unfertilized oocyte whose nuclear
material has been removed or inactivated so as to produce a living organism,
at any stage of development, that is genetically identical to an existing or
previously existing human organism;
(B) Artificially subdividing a human embryo at any time
from the two-cell stage onward resulting in more than one (1) human organism;
or
(C) Introducing pluripotent stem cells from any source
into a human embryo or artificially manufactured human embryo or trophoblast
under conditions where the introduced cells generate all or most of the body
tissues of the developing organism;
(5) “Public funds” means without limitation:
(A) Moneys received or collected by the state or any
official, department, division, agency, or educational or political
subdivision of the state, including without limitation:
(i) Moneys derived from federal, state, or local
taxes;
(ii) Gifts or grants from any source;
(iii) Settlement of any claim or cause of action;
(iv) Bond proceeds or investment income;
(v) Federal grants or payments; or
(vi) Intergovernmental transfers; and
(B) Moneys received or controlled by an official,
department, division, or agency of the state government or any educational or
political subdivision of the state pursuant to an appropriation by the
General Assembly; and
(6) “Somatic cell” means a diploid cell, having a complete set
of chromosomes, obtained or derived from a living or deceased human body at
any stage of development.

105 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
20-16-2204. Prohibitions.
(a) Public funds shall not be used to:
(1) Finance human cloning or destructive embryo research,
including destructive embryonic stem cell research;
(2) Buy, receive, or otherwise transfer a human embryo with the
knowledge that the embryo will be subject to destructive research; or
(3) Buy, receive, or otherwise transfer gametes with the
knowledge that a human embryo will be produced from the gametes to be used in
destructive research.
(b) The state, a state educational institution, or a political
subdivision of the state shall not use public funds, facilities, or employees
to knowingly destroy human embryos for the purpose of research or knowingly
participate in human cloning or attempted human cloning.

20-16-2205. Exceptions.
This subchapter does not restrict the funding of areas of scientific
research not specifically prohibited by this subchapter, including without
limitation:
(1) In vitro fertilization and accompanying embryo transfer to
the body of a woman;
(2) Administration of fertility-enhancing drugs;
(3) Research in the use of nuclear transfer or other cloning
techniques to produce molecules, deoxyribonucleic acid, cells other than
human embryos, tissues, organs, plants, or animals other than humans; and
(4) Any diagnostic procedure that benefits the human embryo
subject to destructive tests while not imposing risks greater than those
considered acceptable for other human research subjects.

20-16-2206. Penalties and sanctions.
(a) A person or entity that knowingly fails to comply with the
provisions of this subchapter is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) A person or entity that knowingly fails to comply with the
provisions of this subchapter shall be fined a civil penalty in the amount of
one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(c) A violation of this subchapter may be the basis for:
(1) Denying an application for an initial license, permit,
106 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
certificate, or any other form of permission required to practice or engage
in a trade, occupation, or profession;
(2) Denying an application for renewal of a license, permit,
certificate, or any other form of permission required to practice or engage
in a trade, occupation, or profession; or
(3) Revoking a license, permit, certificate, or any other form
of permission required to practice or engage in a trade, occupation, or
profession.

20-16-2207. Standing.
A taxpayer of this state or any political subdivision of this state
shall have standing to bring suit to enforce this subchapter against:
(1) The state, any official, department, division, agency, or
political subdivision of this state; and
(2) A recipient of public funds that is in violation of this
subchapter.

20-16-2208. Right of intervention.
The General Assembly by joint resolution may appoint one (1) or more of
its members who sponsored or cosponsored this subchapter in his or her
official capacity to intervene as a matter of right in any case in which the
constitutionality of this subchapter is challenged.

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 23, is
repealed.
Subchapter 23 — Perinatal Palliative Care Information Act

20-16-2301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Perinatal
Palliative Care Information Act”.

20-16-2302. Legislative findings and purpose.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) As diagnosis of prenatal conditions improves, more lethal
fetal anomalies are diagnosed earlier in pregnancy;
(2)(A) Currently, parents are often given minimal options.
107 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(B) Parents must choose between terminating the pregnancy
or simply waiting for the child to die;
(3) The majority of parents in the situation described in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section choose to terminate the pregnancy, with
only twenty percent (20%) of parents deciding to continue the pregnancy;
(4) Studies indicate that choosing to terminate a pregnancy can
pose severe long-term psychological risks for a woman, including the risk of
post-traumatic stress, depression, and anxiety;
(5) Parents who choose to continue the pregnancy under the
supportive, compassionate care of a perinatal palliative care team report
being emotionally and spiritually prepared for the birth of a child; and
(6) Studies reveal that when given the option, at least eighty
to eighty-seven percent (80-87%) of parents choose to continue their
pregnancies in a supportive environment of perinatal palliative care.
(b) It is the purpose of this subchapter to:
(1) Guarantee that a woman considering an abortion after a
diagnosis of a lethal fetal anomaly is presented with information on the
option of perinatal palliative care; and
(2) Ensure that any abortion choice that a woman makes has been
fully informed.

20-16-2303. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing any
instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman, with
knowledge that the termination by any of those means will with reasonable
likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the intent to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Lethal fetal anomaly” means a fetal condition diagnosed
108 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
before birth that will result in the death of the unborn child with
reasonable certainty within three (3) months of the birth;
(3) “Medical emergency” means, based on the good faith clinical
judgment of the physician, a condition that has complicated the medical
condition of the pregnant woman so as to necessitate the immediate
termination of the pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will
create a serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major
bodily function;
(4)(A) “Perinatal palliative care” means comprehensive support
to the pregnant woman and her family that includes support from the time of
diagnosis, through the time of birth and the death of the infant, and through
the postpartum period.
(B) “Perinatal palliative care” may include without
limitation counseling and medical care by maternal-fetal medical specialists,
obstetricians, neonatologists, anesthesia specialists, clergy, social
workers, and specialty nurses focused on alleviating fear and ensuring that
the woman and her family experience the life and death of the child in a
comfortable and supportive environment; and
(5) “Physician” means a person licensed to practice medicine in
this state, including a medical doctor and a doctor of osteopathy.

20-16-2304. Informed consent for abortion to include perinatal
palliative care information.
(a) Except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to an abortion
when the unborn child has been diagnosed with a lethal fetal anomaly is
voluntary and informed only if at least seventy-two (72) hours before the
abortion:
(1) The physician performing the abortion has verbally informed
the pregnant woman that perinatal palliative care services are available and
has offered perinatal palliative care services as an alternative to abortion;
and
(2) The pregnant woman is given a list of perinatal palliative
care services available both in the state and nationally that is prepared by
the Department of Health and organized geographically by location.
(b) If the pregnant woman declines perinatal palliative care services,
the pregnant woman shall certify in writing that:
109 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(1) She declines the perinatal palliative care services; and
(2) She has received the materials described in subdivision
(a)(2) of this section.

20-16-2305. Professional sanctions.
(a) A violation of this subchapter shall constitute unprofessional
conduct and shall result in the revocation of a physician's license to
practice medicine.
(b) A violation of this subchapter may be used as the basis for:
(1) Denying an application for licensure, certification, permit,
registration, or other form of permission required to practice or engage in a
trade, occupation, or profession;
(2) Denying an application for renewal of licensure,
certification, permit, registration, or other form of permission required to
practice or engage in a trade, occupation, or profession; and
(3) Revoking a license, certification, permit, registration, or
other form of permission required to practice or engage in a trade,
occupation, or profession.

20-16-2306. Right of intervention.
The General Assembly by joint resolution may appoint one (1) or more of
its members who sponsored or cosponsored this subchapter in his or her
official capacity to intervene as a matter of right in any case in which the
constitutionality of this subchapter is challenged.

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 24, is
repealed.
Subchapter 24 — Every Mom Matters Act

20-16-2401. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Every Mom
Matters Act”.

20-16-2402. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing any
110 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman, with
knowledge that the termination by any of those means will with reasonable
likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the intent to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous
abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Abuse” means the same as defined in § 12-18-103;
(3) “Agency” means an entity that contracts with the Department
of Human Services to provide the services required under § 20-8-1001 or the
resource access assistance offer;
(4) “Assault” means the act or offense described in §§ 5-13-204
— 5-13-207;
(5) “Care agent” means a person employed by an agency to perform
the services required by this subchapter;
(6) “Human trafficking” means the act or offense described in
the Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq.;
(7) “Medical emergency” means a condition that, based on the
good faith clinical judgment of the physician, has complicated the medical
condition of the pregnant woman so as to necessitate the immediate
termination of the pregnancy to avert the woman's death or for which a delay
will create a serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a
major bodily function;
(8) “Neglect” means the same as defined in § 12-18-103; and
(9) “Sexual assault” means an act or offense described in § 5-
14-101 et seq., except for a misdemeanor violation of sexual indecency with a
child, § 5-14-110.

20-16-2403. Resource access assistance offer.
(a) A person shall not perform an abortion unless the person verifies
that the woman on whom the abortion is to be performed has received a
resource access assistance offer.
111 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(b) A resource access assistance offer under subsection (a) of this
section shall consist of a care agent's:
(1) Informing the pregnant woman of the availability of free:
(A) Healthy pregnancy program services offered under § 20-
8-1001(d)(2); and
(B) Care plan coordination services offered under § 20-8-
1001(d)(3);
(2) Providing education on other public and private resources
available to address the socioeconomic needs of the pregnant woman or the
biological father of the unborn child;
(3) Offering screening and assistance for abuse, assault, sexual
assault, neglect, coercion, and human trafficking; and
(4) Offering medically accurate information using the
informational materials described in the Woman's Right-to-Know Act, § 20-16-
1701 et seq.
(c) The pregnant woman is not required to:
(1) Initiate any offered services in order to obtain an
abortion; or
(2) Provide any information to the care agent except her unique
identifying number as described in § 20-16-2407.
(d) The resource access assistance offer shall be provided by the
state at no cost to the woman.
(e) A care agent who provides a resource access assistance offer under
this section shall not refer a woman to an abortion provider, recommend
abortion, or take any other action that directly or indirectly advises a
woman to obtain or assists a woman in obtaining an abortion.

20-16-2404. Applicability.
(a) For healthy pregnancy program services and care plan coordination
services offered under § 20-8-1001(d)(2) and (3):
(1) A pregnant woman is not required to initiate or complete
healthy pregnancy program services or care plan coordination services in
order to obtain an abortion;
(2) A pregnant woman who initiates healthy pregnancy program
services or care plan coordination services may decline or discontinue the
healthy pregnancy program services or care plan coordination services at any
112 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
time; and
(3) An agency shall prioritize care plan coordination services
and healthy pregnancy program services for women who have received a resource
access assistance offer.
(b)(1) This subchapter does not apply in the case of a medical
emergency.
(2) A person who performs an abortion in a medical emergency
shall:
(A) Include in the pregnant woman's medical records a
statement signed by the physician of the pregnant woman certifying the nature
of the medical emergency; and
(B) Not later than thirty (30) days after the date that
the abortion is performed, certify to the Department of Health the specific
medical condition that constituted the medical emergency.

20-16-2405. Agencies. [Effective if contingency in Acts 2023, No. 703,
§ 10 is met.]
(a) Upon the effective date of this section, the Department of Human
Services shall:
(1)(A) Contract with a number of agencies sufficient to ensure
that each pregnant woman seeking an abortion in Arkansas receives a resource
access assistance offer and has the opportunity to receive care plan
coordination services and healthy pregnancy program services.
(B) The procurement of a vendor to serve as an agency
shall be done through the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., by
the Office of State Procurement;
(2) Annually, designate the proportion of resource access
assistance offers to be provided by each agency's share of participants in
care plan coordination services or healthy pregnancy program services; and
(3) Contract only with agencies that are capable of offering all
of the services required under § 20-8-1001 or the resource access assistance
offer.
(b) An agency shall be able, at a minimum, to provide resource access
assistance offers, care plan coordination services, and healthy pregnancy
program services by telephonic means using a toll-free number established by
the department.
113 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(c) Each agency and any subcontractor or care agent of the agency
providing services related to § 20-8-1001 or resource access assistance
offers shall not:
(1) Be an abortion provider or entity that directly or
indirectly assists women in obtaining an abortion;
(2) Own, operate, or be affiliated with an abortion provider or
an entity that directly or indirectly promotes abortions or assists women in
obtaining an abortion;
(3) Employ a person who has performed an abortion in the last
two (2) years;
(4) Have as a director, board member, officer, volunteer, or
employee a person who serves in any of these roles for an entity described in
subdivisions (c)(1)-(3) of this section; or
(5) Refer women to an abortion provider, recommend abortion, or
take any other action that directly or indirectly advises or assists a woman
in obtaining an abortion.

20-16-2406. Care agents.
A care agent or other person providing healthy pregnancy program
services or care plan coordination services through a subcontract with an
agency or as a volunteer with an agency shall:
(1) Meet the qualifications established by rule of the
Department of Health;
(2) Have not performed an abortion in the last two (2) years;
(3) Have not served as a director, board member, officer,
volunteer, or employee for an entity described in § 20-16-2405(c)(1)-(3) in
the last two (2) years;
(4) Agree to maintain the confidentiality of information the
care agent or other person obtains while performing services under § 20-8-
1001 or the resource access assistance offer;
(5) Complete a training program using a standardized curriculum
regarding recognizing signs that a person may have been a victim of human
trafficking and providing appropriate assistance to a person who may have
been a victim of human trafficking; and
(6) Not refer women to an abortion provider, recommend abortion,
or take any other action that directly or indirectly advises a woman to
114 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
obtain or assists a woman in obtaining an abortion.

20-16-2407. Administration.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall:
(1)(A) Before implementation of the services under § 20-8-1001
or the resource access assistance offer, create a program-specific website
that describes the services offered by § 20-8-1001 and the resource access
assistance offer.
(B) The department may also create materials using other
media, including print and electronic media, to convey information about the
services under § 20-8-1001 and the resource access assistance offer to the
public;
(2)(A) Establish a single toll-free number for pregnant women
seeking an abortion in Arkansas to call in order to receive a resource access
assistance offer.
(B) The toll-free number shall automatically connect the
pregnant woman to an agency based on the proportion determined under § 20-16-
2405(a)(2);
(3)(A) Before implementation of the resource access assistance
offer, develop and maintain a secure database.
(B) The secure database shall:
(i) Generate a unique identifying number;
(ii) Be accessible only to a person who is to perform
an abortion or an agent of the person performing an abortion, agencies, and
the department; and
(iii) Not transmit any information to:
(a) The agency or care agent concerning the
identity or location of the person who performs the abortion or the facility
at which the abortion is performed; or
(b) The person providing the abortion or the
agent of the person performing the abortion concerning the identity of the
agency or care agent providing the resource access assistance offer.
(C) The unique identifying number shall not contain
personally identifiable information; and
(4) For each agency, report on the department's website the
percentage of pregnant women who received a resource access assistance offer
115 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
from the agency and subsequently obtained an abortion in the state.
(b)(1) Before receiving payment for abortion-related services,
administering any sedative or anesthesia, or performing an abortion, a person
who is performing an abortion or an agent of the person performing the
abortion shall:
(A) Register each prospective abortion in the secure
database and obtain a unique identifying number for the pregnant woman's
prospective abortion;
(B) Provide the pregnant woman seeking an abortion with
the unique identifying number for her prospective abortion;
(C) Record the unique identifying number for the pregnant
woman's prospective abortion in the pregnant woman's medical file;
(D) Verify through the secure database that the pregnant
woman received a resource access assistance offer;
(E) Document the verification in the secure database; and
(F) Record the verification in the pregnant woman's
medical record.
(2) Within two (2) business days after performing an abortion,
the person who performs the abortion or the person's agent shall report to
the department the unique identifying number for each abortion performed and
the date and time that the abortion was performed.
(c) A care agent shall:
(1) Provide the resource access assistance offer, care plan
coordination services, and healthy pregnancy program services; and
(2) Record the information required under this section.
(d) An agency shall:
(1) Record and report monthly to the department information
pertaining to resource access assistance offers provided by the agency or the
care agents employed by the agency, including without limitation:
(A) The number of pregnant women who indicated a need for
assistance as victims of:
(i) Assault, sexual assault, abuse, or neglect;
(ii) Coercion; or
(iii) Human trafficking;
(B) The number of individuals receiving resource access
assistance offers who requested care plan coordination services; and
116 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(C) The number of individuals receiving resource access
assistance offers who requested healthy pregnancy program services;
(2) Record and report monthly to the department information
pertaining to care plan coordination services and healthy pregnancy program
services provided by the agency or the care agents employed by the agency,
including without limitation:
(A) The number of individuals receiving resource access
assistance offers who identified a need for support in one (1) or more of the
following areas:
(i) Abuse, assault, sexual assault, coercion, or
neglect;
(ii) Education or training for a professional
certification;
(iii) Housing assistance;
(iv) Employment assistance;
(v) Resume development;
(vi) Childcare;
(vii) Adoption services;
(viii) Financial assistance;
(ix) Substance abuse treatment and alcohol abuse
treatment;
(x) Mental health care;
(xi) Medical care;
(xii) Human trafficking; or
(xiii) Health benefit plan coverage; and
(B) The resources, services, and referrals provided by the
agency or a care agent; and
(3)(A) Confirm in the secure database using the unique
identifying number that a resource access assistance offer was made.
(B) The confirmation required under subdivision (d)(3)(A)
of this section shall be completed before 11:59 p.m. on the day that the
resource access assistance offer was made.

20-16-2408. Medical record audit procedure.
(a) The Department of Health shall audit abortion facilities and
persons performing abortions to ensure compliance with this subchapter.
117 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(b) An audit under subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) Be at a random, unannounced, and reasonable time;
(2) Occur at least one (1) time each year for each abortion
facility and person who performs abortions; and
(3) Consist of:
(A) A review of the medical records of no less than ten
percent (10%) of the women who obtained an abortion since the last audit was
performed; and
(B) A verification and confirmation that the person
performing the abortion fully complied with the requirements of § 20-16-
2407(b).
(c) If the department finds that more than five percent (5%) of the
audited medical records indicate noncompliance with the requirements of § 20-
16-2407(b), the department shall audit the remainder of the medical records
of the women who received abortions since the last audit was performed.

20-16-2409. Penalties.
(a)(1) A person who performs an abortion shall be subject to a fine of
five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each abortion performed without complying
with the requirements of § 20-16-2407.
(2) The abortion facility at which the abortion was performed
shall be jointly and severally liable for each fine assessed under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(b) The fine imposed by this section is in addition to the criminal
liability under the Woman's Right-to-Know Act, § 20-16-1701 et seq.
(c) The Attorney General or the prosecuting attorney of the judicial
district in which the abortion was performed may file an action to recover
the fine assessed under subdivision (a)(1) of this section as well as
reasonable and necessary attorney's fees and costs incurred in bringing the
action.
(d)(1) Any person may bring a civil action to recover the civil
penalty assessed under this section if:
(A) An action has not already been initiated by the
Attorney General or the prosecuting attorney of the judicial district in
which the abortion was performed; and
(B) Another person has not already recovered a fine for
118 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
that specific violation of this subchapter.
(2) If the person recovers the fine assessed under this section,
the person may also recover attorney's fees and costs incurred in bringing
the action.

20-16-2410. Confidentiality and disclosure.
(a) All personally identifiable information held by the Department of
Health or Department of Human Services under this subchapter is confidential
and is not subject to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et
seq.
(b) Disclosure of information and records may be made:
(1) For statistical purposes if a care agent, pregnant woman,
biological father of the unborn child, physician, or abortion facility is not
identified;
(2) With the consent of each person, patient, and abortion
facility identified in the information released; or
(3) To:
(A) Appropriate state agencies or courts to enforce this
subchapter;
(B) Appropriate state licensing boards to enforce
licensing laws;
(C) Licensed medical or healthcare personnel currently
treating the patient; or
(D) Physicians providing abortions or agencies, to the
extent necessary to fulfill the agencies' obligations under this subchapter.
(c) Disclosure of protected health information that is allowed for
public health, safety, and law enforcement purposes is not a violation of the
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-
191.

20-16-2411. Conscience protections.
The Department of Human Services shall not require any care agent or
agency to refer a woman for any social or medical service to which the care
agent or agency has a conscience objection.

20-16-2412. Construction.
119 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
This subchapter does not:
(1) Create or recognize a right to abortion;
(2) Create or recognize a right to a particular method of
abortion; or
(3) Make lawful an abortion that is currently unlawful under any
law of this state.

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, Subchapter 25, is
repealed.
Subchapter 25 — Informed Consent for Chemical Abortion Act

20-16-2501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Informed
Consent for Chemical Abortion Act”.

20-16-2502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Chemical abortion” means the use, provision,
prescription, or dispensation of a medicine, drug, or any other substance
used, provided, prescribed, or dispensed with the intent of terminating the
clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman, with knowledge that the
termination will with reasonable likelihood cause the death of the unborn
child.
(B) “Chemical abortion” includes the off-label use of
drugs known to have abortion-inducing properties, which are prescribed
specifically with the intent of causing an abortion, such as misoprostol and
methotrexate.
(C) “Chemical abortion” does not apply to drugs that may
be known to cause an abortion but which are prescribed for other medical
indication; and
(2) “Medical emergency” means a condition that, on the basis of
the physician's good-faith clinical judgment, complicates the medical
condition of a pregnant woman and necessitates the immediate termination of
her pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will create serious
risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function.

120 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
20-16-2503. Informed consent for chemical abortions.
(a) A chemical abortion shall not be performed or induced without the
voluntary and informed consent of the pregnant woman upon whom the chemical
abortion is to be performed or induced.
(b) Except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to a chemical
abortion is voluntary and informational only if at least seventy-two (72)
hours before the abortion, the healthcare provider who is to perform the
chemical abortion or the referring healthcare provider has informed the
pregnant woman, orally and in person, of the following:
(1) The probable gestational age of the unborn child as
determined by patient history and ultrasound results used to confirm the
gestational age;
(2) A detailed description of the chemical abortion regimen to
be used;
(3) A detailed list of the risks and complications related to
the specific chemical abortion regimen to be used, including without
limitation hemorrhage, failure to remove all pregnancy tissue which may
require an additional procedure, sepsis or other infections, sterility,
possible continuation of pregnancy, and death;
(4) Information about Rh incompatibility, including that if the
pregnant woman has an Rh negative blood type, she should receive an injection
of Rh immunoglobulin at the time of the chemical abortion to prevent Rh
incompatibility in future pregnancies, which can lead to complications and
miscarriage;
(5) The risks of complications from a chemical abortion increase
with advancing gestational age;
(6) Information on reversing the effects of the chemical
abortion if the pregnant woman changes her mind, but that time is of the
essence;
(7) Human trafficking literature, also known as “Laura's Card”,
as described in § 16-90-1107;
(8) Information about post-abortion care, including how to
handle and respond to and report complications from the chemical abortion;
and
(9) Information on scheduling post-abortion medical visits to
ensure completion of the abortion, assess the need for additional procedures
121 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
or care, and assess bleeding or other potential complications.
(c)(1) Except in the case of a medical emergency, before a chemical
abortion, a pregnant woman shall certify on a written checklist form provided
or approved by the Department of Health that the information described in
subsection (b) of this section has been provided.
(2)(A) The healthcare provider who is to perform the chemical
abortion shall receive, sign, and date a copy of the written certification
described in subdivision (c)(1) of this section before performing a chemical
abortion.
(B) The healthcare provider shall retain a copy of the
written certification form in the pregnant woman's medical record.

20-16-2504. Individual reporting — Aggregate reporting.
(a)(1) A healthcare provider or healthcare facility shall submit an
individual reporting form to the Department of Health within fifteen (15)
days after each month's end.
(2) The healthcare provider shall sign each individual reporting
form.
(b)(1) A report submitted as described in subsection (a) of this
section is not a public record and shall remain confidential except that a
disclosure may be made to law enforcement officials upon an order of a court
after an application showing good cause.
(2) The court may condition disclosure of information upon any
appropriate safeguards the court may impose.
(c) The department shall prepare an individual reporting form, which
shall include the following information:
(1) The date of the chemical abortion;
(2) The specific chemical abortion regimen used;
(3) The probable gestational age of the unborn child;
(4) The age of the pregnant woman at the time the chemical
abortion was performed or induced;
(5) The pregnant woman's state and county of residence;
(6) Whether, before seeking a chemical abortion, the pregnant
woman received any other verbal or written counseling related to potential
risks or complications and alternatives to a chemical abortion;
(7) The specific reason for the chemical abortion, including
122 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
without limitation:
(A) The pregnancy is the result of rape or incest;
(B) Economic reasons;
(C) The pregnant woman does not want a pregnancy or child
at this time;
(D) The pregnant woman's physical health is endangered,
specifically identifying the reason her physical health is endangered,
including any preexisting condition;
(E) The pregnant woman's psychological, mental, or
emotional health is endangered, specifically identifying the reason her
psychological, mental, or emotional health is endangered, including any
preexisting condition;
(F) The pregnant woman will suffer substantial and
irreversible impairment of a major bodily function if the pregnancy
continues, specifically identifying the potential impairment;
(G) The diagnosis, presence, or presumed presence of a
genetic anomaly, specifically identifying the anomaly; or
(H) Refusal of the pregnant woman to answer;
(8) The number of prior pregnancies, live births, induced
abortions, and spontaneous abortions of the pregnant woman;
(9) Whether the chemical abortion was paid for by:
(A) Private health coverage;
(B) Public assistance health coverage; or
(C) Self-pay; and
(10) Complications, if any and whenever known, from the chemical
abortion.
(d)(1) A healthcare facility in which a chemical abortion is performed
during any quarter year shall file with the department a report showing the
total number of chemical abortions performed in the facility during that
quarter year.
(2) The aggregate report shall include the total number of
chemical abortions performed in each trimester of pregnancy.
(3) The department shall prepare an aggregate reporting form.
(e) The reporting forms under this section shall not contain:
(1) The name of the pregnant woman;
(2) Common identifiers of the pregnant woman, including her
123 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
Social Security number or her driver's license number; or
(3) Any other information that would make it possible to
identify the pregnant woman.
(f)(1) The department shall report comprehensive annual statistical
data based upon data gathered from the reports under this section to the
General Assembly.
(2) The annual report shall not disclose or lead to the
disclosure of the identity of any healthcare provider or person filing a
report under this section or of any woman who is the subject of a report.
(3) The annual report shall be made available to the public in a
downloadable format on the department's website.
(g)(1) The department shall summarize the data collected from the
reports required by this section and submit the summary to the Centers for
Medicare & Medicaid Services.
(2) The summary shall be made available to the public in a
downloadable format on the department's website.
(h) This section does not preclude the voluntary or required
submission of other reports or forms regarding chemical abortion.

20-16-2505. Collection and reporting of information.
(a) The Department of Health shall ensure that all information
collected by the department regarding chemical abortions performed in this
state shall be available to the public in printed form and on a twenty-four-
hour basis on the department's website.
(b) In no case shall the privacy of a patient or doctor be
compromised.
(c) The information collected by the department regarding abortions
performed in this state shall be continually updated.
(d)(1)(A) By June 3 of each year, the department shall issue a public
report providing statistics on the number of women who were provided
information and materials pursuant to this subchapter during the previous
calendar year.
(B) Each report shall also provide the statistics for all
previous calendar years, adjusted to reflect any additional information
received after the deadline.
(2) The department shall take care to ensure that none of the
124 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
information included in the public reports could reasonably lead to the
identification of any individual who received information or materials in
accordance with § 20-16-2503.

20-16-2506. Rules.
(a)(1) The State Board of Health shall adopt rules to implement this
subchapter.
(2) The State Board of Health may add by rule additional
examples of complications to supplement those in § 20-16-2503.
(b) The Arkansas State Medical Board shall promulgate rules to ensure
that physicians who perform abortions, referring physicians, or agents of
either physician comply with all the requirements of this subchapter.

20-16-2507. Criminal penalty.
A person who purposely, knowingly, recklessly, or negligently violates
this subchapter commits a Class A misdemeanor.

20-16-2508. Civil penalties.
(a) In addition to any remedies available under the common law or
statutory law of this state, failure to comply with the requirements of this
subchapter shall provide a basis for a:
(1) Civil malpractice action for actual and punitive damages;
and
(2) Professional disciplinary action under the Arkansas Medical
Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et
seq.
(b) A civil penalty shall not be assessed against the woman upon whom
the abortion is performed.
(c) When requested, the court shall allow a woman to proceed using
solely her initials or a pseudonym and may close the proceedings in the case
and enter other protective orders to preserve the privacy of the woman upon
whom the abortion was performed or attempted.
(d) If judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff, the court shall
also render judgment for a reasonable attorney's fee in favor of the
plaintiff against the defendant.
(e) If judgment is rendered in favor of the defendant and the court
125 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
finds that the plaintiff's suit was frivolous and brought in bad faith, the
court shall also render judgment for a reasonable attorney's fee in favor of
the defendant against the plaintiff.

20-16-2509. Construction.
(a) This subchapter does not create or recognize a right to abortion.
(b) This subchapter is not intended to make lawful an abortion that is
currently unlawful.

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, Subchapter 6, is
repealed.
Subchapter 6 — Prohibited Taxpayer Resource Transactions for Abortions

25-1-601. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using or prescribing an
instrument, medicine, drug, device, or another substance or means with the
intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman with
knowledge that the termination by those means will with reasonable likelihood
cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) “Abortion” as defined under subdivision (1)(A) of this
section shall not include an act performed to:
(i) Save the life of the mother;
(ii) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
(iii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by natural
causes; or
(iv) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Affiliate” means an individual or entity that, directly or
indirectly, owns, controls, is controlled by, or is under the common control
of another individual or entity, in whole or in part, or a subsidiary,
parent, or sibling entity;
(3) “Governmental entity” means:
(A) This state;
(B) A state agency in the executive, judicial, or
legislative branch of state government; or
126 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
(C) A political subdivision of this state;
(4) “Political subdivision” means a legally separate and
distinct instrumentality of the state, including without limitation a:
(A) County;
(B) City; or
(C) Municipality; and
(5)(A) “Taxpayer resource transaction” means a sale, purchase,
lease, donation of money, goods, services, or real property, or any other
transaction between a governmental entity and a private entity that provides
to the private entity something of value derived from state or local tax
revenue, regardless of whether the governmental entity receives something of
value in return.
(B) “Taxpayer resource transaction” includes advocacy or
lobbying by or on behalf of a governmental entity in behalf of an abortion
provider or an affiliate of an abortion provider, but does not include an:
(i) Officer's or employee of a governmental entity's
providing information to a member of the legislature or appearing before a
legislative committee at the request of the member or committee;
(ii) Elected official's advocating for or against
legislation pending before the legislature or otherwise influencing or
attempting to influence the outcome of legislation pending before the
legislature while acting in the capacity of an elected official; or
(iii) Individual's speaking as a private citizen on a
matter of public concern.
(C) “Taxpayer resource transaction” does not include the
provision of basic public services, including without limitation fire and
police protection and utilities, by a governmental entity to an abortion
provider or an affiliate of an abortion provider in the same manner as the
governmental entity provides the services to the general public.

25-1-602. Taxpayer resource transaction prohibited.
(a) Except as provided by subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a
governmental entity may not enter into a taxpayer resource transaction with
an abortion provider or an affiliate of an abortion provider.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a taxpayer
resource transaction that is subject to a federal law in conflict with
127 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1011
subsection (a) of this section as determined and confirmed in writing by the
Attorney General.
(c) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to:
(1) A hospital licensed under the laws of this state;
(2) A state hospital;
(3) A teaching hospital of a public or private institution of
higher education; or
(4) An accredited residency program providing training to
resident physicians.
(d) Subsection (c) of this section shall not permit the use of
taxpayer funds to pay for an abortion.

25-1-603. Action by Attorney General.
(a) The office of the Attorney General may investigate and collect
information concerning a violation of this subchapter.
(b) The Attorney General may bring an action in the name of the State
of Arkansas to enjoin a violation of this subchapter.

/s/A. Collins

















128 01-16-2025 16:28:41 JMB006